<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR891018-0026 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.10-18-89.f2.A1025</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 200 / Wednesday, October 18, 1989/ Proposed Rules<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">14 CFR Parts 1, 11, 65, 71, 75, 91, 93, 101, 103, 105, 121, 127, 137,and 171</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. 24456, Notice No. 89-28]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 2120-AB95</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Airspace Reclassification</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Federal Aviation Administration (FAA), DOT.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (NPRM).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This notice proposes to adopt certain recommendationsof the National Airspace Review (NAR) concerning changes to regulationsand procedures dealing with airspace classification. These changes areintended to: (1) Simplify airspace designations; (2) achieve internationalcommonality of airspace designations; (3) increase standardization of equipmentrequirements for operations in the various classifications of airspace;and (4) associate appropriate pilot certification requirements, visualflight rules (VFR) visibility and distance from clouds rules, and air trafficservices offered in each proposed class of airspace. This proposal representsthe combination of three separate advance proposals issued in 1985 concerningairspace assignment and related air traffic operating rules. The FAA believesthe simplified airspace classification proposed in this action will reduceexisting airspace complexity and thereby enhance safety.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>Comments must be received on or before April 18, 1990.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2>Comments may be mailed or delivered in duplicate to:Federal Aviation Administration, Office of Chief Counsel, Attention: RulesDocket (AGC-204), Docket No. 24456, 800 Independence Avenue SW., Washington,DC 20591. Comments may be examined in the Rules Docket weekdays, exceptFederal holidays, between 8:30 a.m. and 5:00 p.m.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Mr. A. Wayne Pierce, Air TrafficRules Branch, ATO-230, Federal Aviation Administration, 800 IndependenceAvenue SW., Washington, DC 20591, telephone (202) 267-8783.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Comments Invited</ITAG>Interested persons are invited to participate in these proposed rulemakingprocedures by submitting such written data, views, or arguments as theymay desire. Any materials submitted should identify the regulatory docketor notice number and be submitted in duplicate to the address above. Allcommunications received on or before the closing date for comments willbe considered by the Administrator before taking further rulemaking action.Persons wishing the FAA to acknowledge receipt of their comments submittedin response to this notice must submit with those comments a self-addressed,stamped postcard on which the following statement is made: ``Comments toDocket No. 24456.'' The postcard will be date/time stamped and returnedto the commenter. The proposals contained in this notice may be changedas a result of comments received. All comments submitted will be available,both before and after the closing date for comments, in the Rules Docketfor examination by interested persons. A report summarizing each substantivepublic contact with FAA personnel concerned with this rulemaking will befiled in the docket. <ITAG tagnum="84">Availability of NPRM's</ITAG>Any person may obtain a copy of this NPRM by submitting a request to theFederal Aviation Administration, Office of Public Affairs, Attention: PublicInquiry Center, APA-200, 800 Independence Avenue SW., Washington, DC 20591,or by calling (202) 267-3484. Requests must identify the notice numberof this NPRM. Persons interested in being placed on a mailing list forfuture notices should also request a copy of the Advisory Circular No.11-2 which describes the application procedure.<ITAG tagnum="84">Background</ITAG>On April 22, 1982, the National Airspace Review (NAR) plan was publishedin the <T4>Federal Register</T4> (47 FR 17448). The plan encompassed a reviewof airspace use and the procedural aspects of the air traffic control (ATC)system. Organizations participating in the NAR included:<ITAG tagnum="15">Aircraft Owners and Pilots Association (AOPA)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Air Lines Pilots Association (ALPA)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Air Transport Association (ATA)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Department of Defense (DOD)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Experimental Aircraft Association (EAA)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Federal Aviation Administration (FAA)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Helicopter Association International (HAI)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">National Association of State Aviation Officials (NASAO)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">National Business Aircraft Association (NBAA)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Regional Airline Association (RAA)</ITAG>The main objectives of the NAR were:(1) To develop and incorporate into the ATC system a more efficient relationshipbetween traffic flows, airspace allocation, and system capacity. This willinvolve the use of improved air traffic flow management to maximize systemcapacity and improve airspace management.(2) To review and eliminate, wherever possible, governmental restraintsto system efficiency imposed by Federal Aviation Regulations (FAR) andFAA directives thereby reducing complexity and simplifying the ATC system.(3) To revalidate ATC services within the National Airspace System (NAS)with respect to state-of-the-art and future technological improvements.In concert with the foregoing objectives, several NAR task groups wereorganized and assigned to review various issues associated with airspaceclassifications and ATC procedures, pilot certification requirements, andaircraft equipment and operating requirements in the different categoriesof airspace. The recommendations identified and discussed below in theparagraph entitled ``Discussion of Pertinent NAR Recommendations,'' weremade by these task groups and were the basis of three separate advancenotices of proposed rulemaking (ANPRM): Notice No. 85-4, Terminal AirspaceReclassification, Docket No. 24455 (50 FR 5055; 2/5/85); Notice No. 85-5,Airspace Reclassification/Services/Requirements, Docket No. 24456 (50 FR5046; 2/5/85); and Notice No. 85-15, Controlled Airspace Designations inInternational Airspace, Docket No. 24732 (50 FR 30798; 7/29/85).<ITAG tagnum="84">Related Agency Actions</ITAG>Subsequent to the issuance of these ANPRM's, the FAA has undertaken otherregulatory actions which affect the content of the airspace reclassificationbeing proposed. First, on January 29, 1987, the FAA issued Amendment No.91-198 (52 FR 3380; 2/3/87) which required, effective 12/1/87, all aircraftoperating in a Group II terminal control area (TCA) to be equipped witha transponder capable of reporting altitude information.Second, on October 14, 1988, the FAA published Amendment Nos. 61-80, 71-11,and 91-205 (53 FR 40318). Amendment No. 71-11 established a single-classTCA. Operations within what were previously Group II TCA's will be subjectto the more stringent aircraft equipment requirements already existingfor Group I TCA's (Amendment No. 91-205).Pursuant to Amendment Nos. 61-80 and 91-205, operations within a TCA bya student pilot will be limited to those conducted through a TCA, at non-TCAprimary airports, and at selected TCA primary airports. Such student pilotoperations will be allowed only after the student has received specificadditional training, a determination that the student is competent to operatein a TCA, and a logbook endorsement by an instructor of the student's competency.Also proposed under the same NPRM (Notice No. 87-7) that culminated inAmendment Nos. 61-80, 71-11, and 91-205, each aircraft operating below12,500 feet mean sea level (MSL) within 30 miles of a TCA primary airportwould have been required to have an operating transponder with automaticaltitude reporting capability. This last proposal was modified and madea part of Amendment No. 91-203 (52 FR 23356; June 21, 1988). AmendmentNo. 91-203 requires, in pertinent part, altitude encoding: (1) When operatingwithin 30 miles of a TCA primary airport below 10,000 feet; (2) above anairport radar service area (ARSA) below 10,000 feet; (3) anywhere, at andabove 10,000 feet.Third, the FAA proposed, in response to laws enacted in December 1987,Pub. L. 100-202 and Pub. L. 100-223, to lower the Continental Control Areafrom 14,500 feet MSL to 1,200 feet above the surface or an altitude yetto be determined. If this proposition, originally publicized in NoticeNo. 88-2 (53 FR 4306; February 12, 1988), is adopted, there would be noneed to continue to designate controlled airspace with the establishmentof a Federal Airway. The lowering of Continental Control Area was not includedin the final rule, Amendment No. 91-203, and it is not proposed in thisnotice but may be proposed in a separate, subsequent notice. Notice No.88-2 also proposed a requirement for aircraft to be equipped with a transponderand altitude reporting equipment for operations within 40 miles of an airportfor which a terminal radar facility has been established, and for operationsat and above 6,000 feet above the surface or 12,500 feet MSL, whicheveris lower. These altitude reporting requirements were modified and madea part of Amendment No. 91-203, as indicated in the preceding paragraph.The airspace reclassification and requirements proposed earlier in theANPRM's have been revised in this notice to reflect only those proposalswhich have not been incorporated into other related rulemaking actions.Those revisions are addressed later in this document in a discussion ofthe actions proposed.<ITAG tagnum="84">International Implications</ITAG>Canada has already implemented a new airspace classification system dividingCanadian airspace into six categories, and has conducted a formal reviewof that airspace classification system within a framework similarly structuredto the U.S. National Airspace Review (NAR). This review is called the CanadianAirspace Review. Currently, Canada's categories of airspace are definedas Classes A, B, C, D, E, and F. Each class of airspace is associated witha set of pilot qualification requirements, pilot operating rules, and specificATC services.In addition, the Air Navigation Commission (ANC) of the International CivilAviation Organization (ICAO) has accepted a recommendation from the VisualFlight Operations Panel (VFOP) of ICAO which proposes: ``That ICAO, assoon as practicable, provide states and selected international organizationswith information concerning the proposed types of airspace, the types oftraffic, and the air traffic services in each.'' In conjunction with theVFOP recommendation, an airspace classification concept has been developedby the VFOP and accepted by the ANC as a recommendation. The VFOP's recommendations,along with the nearest equivalent U.S. airspace designations, are summarizedas follows:<T3>Airspace A (U.S. Positive Control Areas).</T3> All operations mustbe conducted under instrument flight rules (IFR) and are subject to ATCclearances and instructions. ATC service is provided to all aircraft.<T3>Airspace B (U.S. Terminal Control Areas).</T3> Operations may be conductedunder IFR or visual flight rules (VFR). However, all aircraft are subjectto ATC clearances and instructions. ATC service is provided to all aircraft.<T3>Airspace C (U.S. Airport Radar Service Areas)</T3>. Operations maybe conducted under IFR or VFR; however, all aircraft are subject to ATCclearances and instructions. ATC service is provided to all aircraft operatingunder IFR and, as necessary, to any aircraft operating under VFR when anyaircraft operating under IFR is involved. All VFR operations will be providedcollision hazard information (traffic advisories) and, upon request, conflictresolution instructions.<T3>Airspace D (U.S. Airport Traffic Areas).</T3> Operations may be conductedunder IFR or VFR; however, all aircraft are subject to ATC clearances andinstructions. ATC separation service is provided to aircraft operatingunder IFR only. All traffic will receive collision hazard information (trafficadvisories) and, upon pilot request, conflict resolution instructions.<T3>Airspace E (U.S. General Controlled Airspace)</T3>. Operations maybe conducted under IFR or VFR. ATC service is provided to aircraft operatingunder IFR only. As far as practical, ATC may provide collision hazard information(traffic advisories) to aircraft operating under VFR.<T3>Airspace F (U.S. Has No Equivalent).</T3> Operations may be conductedunder IFR or VFR. ATC services will be provided, so far as practical, toaircraft operating under IFR.<T3>Airspace G (U.S. Uncontrolled Airspace)</T3>. Operations may be conductedunder IFR or VFR when ATC service is not available.<ITAG tagnum="84">Present U.S. Airspace Classification</ITAG>Federal Aviation Regulations (FAR) parts 71, 73, and 75 contain the variousdesignations and definitions of controlled airspace and routes. FAR Part1 contains the definition of an airport traffic area. Uncontrolled airspaceis not designated by regulations but may be thought of as that airspacenot included within the definition of controlled airspace in Part 1. Otherparts of the FAR contain rules under which pilots and operators must operatewhile in the various airspace segments as well as in uncontrolled airspace.Pilot certificates are not regulated or issued with respect to operationsin a specific airspace designation, but may be issued with a limitationon operations to those conducted under VFR. In general, the applicationand extent of ATC services are not regulated under the FAR. ATC servicesare provided in accordance with FAA directives. The following U.S. airspacecomparison table is not thoroughly descriptive of the operating requirementsof each classification, it is meant only to illustrate the similarity ofthe airspace types developed by the ICAO panel and those being proposedin this notice.<T3>Positive Control Areas (PCA)_VFOP Class A Airspace.</T3> Operationsin a PCA must be conducted under IFR and are subject to ATC clearancesand instructions. ATC service is provided to all aircraft.<T3>Terminal Control Areas (TCA)_VFOP Class B Airspace.</T3> Operationsin a TCA may be conducted under IFR or VFR. However, ATC service is providedto all aircraft and all aircraft are subject to ATC clearances and instructions.<T3>Airport Radar Service Areas (ARSA)_VFOP Class C Airspace.</T3> Operationsmay be conducted under IFR or VFR; IFR aircraft are subject to ATC clearancesand instructions, VFR aircraft must maintain two-way radio communicationsand are subject to certain ATC instructions. ATC separation is providedto all aircraft operating under IFR and, as necessary, to any flights operatingunder VFR when any aircraft operating under IFR is involved. VFR aircraftare provided with traffic advisories as necessary. Safety alerts are providedto all aircraft.<T3>Airport Traffic Area_VFOP Class D Airspace.</T3> Operations may beconducted under either IFR or VFR; all aircraft must be operating to orfrom an airport in the air traffic area or have an authorization from theprimary airport tower. All aircraft (except those operating to or froman uncontrolled airport within an air traffic area are subject to ATC clearancesand instructions. ATC separation is provided to aircraft operations conductedunder IFR and to takeoff and landing operations. All aircraft are providedwith safety alerts. Traffic advisories are provided on a controller-workload-permittingbasis.<T3>General Controlled Airspace_VFOP Class E Airspace.</T3> For the purposeof showing comparisons with the reclassification being proposed under thisNPRM, the term ``General Controlled Airspace'' is used to describe U.S.airspace designations within which the pilot operating requirements andATC services are common to the class of airspace recommended by the VFOP.This designation or classification does not presently exist in the UnitedStates. General Controlled Airspace may be considered to be that designatedas Colored Federal Airways, very high frequency omnidirectional range (VOR)Federal Airways, the Continental Control Area, Control Areas Associatedwith Jet Routes Outside the Continental Control Area, Additional ControlAreas, Control Area Extensions, Control Zones Without Operating ControlTowers, Transition Areas, Area High Routes Outside the United States, andArea Low Routes. Operations may be conducted in these airspace designationsunder IFR or VFR. ATC separation service is provided only to aircraft operatingunder IFR. ATC traffic advisory service, however, is provided to otheraircraft upon request and on a controller-workload-permitting basis.<T3>Special Use Airspace (SUA)_VFOP, Each Nation Would Use Existing Names.</T3>Certain types of airspace in this category are defined in, and designatedunder, part 73 of the FAR (prohibited areas and restricted areas). TheFAA also establishes other types of SUA under nonrulemaking proceduressuch as alert areas, warning areas, controlled firing areas, and militaryoperations areas. Operations within SUA can be conducted under IFR andVFR, and ATC services are provided only on a case-by-case basis. Section91.105, visibility and distance from clouds minimums apply.<T3>Uncontrolled Airspace_VFOP Class G Airspace.</T3> Airspace which isnot otherwise designated as a continental control area, control area, controlzone, terminal control area, or transition area, within which some or allaircraft may be subject to ATC. Under this proposal, Class G would becomeall navigable airspace not otherwise designated as Class A, B, C, D, E,or SUA.<ITAG tagnum="84">Discussion of Comments to the Advance Notices</ITAG>The comments discussed below were received in response to the three advancerulemaking efforts. These separate efforts are being combined into thisaction and are being published as one NPRM. Several comments were receivedwhich are no longer applicable to this proposal, as they addressed proposalsoriginally contained in the ANPRM's which have been acted upon throughother rulemaking actions.The Air Line Pilot Association (ALPA) commented that the proposal lackscommonality with the Canadian classification and the proposed ICAO airspacesystem and suggested that it was premature to adopt an airspace classificationbefore there is international agreement. Further, ALPA recommended thatthe airspace reclassification proposal be used only as a guide for furtherinternational consideration.However, the Aircraft Owners and Pilots Association (AOPA) suggested thatinternational standardization can be achieved and that it is reasonableto assume that an airspace designator should be necessary for each categoryof airspace that is common in its operations, equipment, and pilot qualificationrequirements. The VFOP-recommended airspace classification, AOPA suggests,has sufficient merit to justify consideration for some degree of incorporationin the U.S. system. AOPA recommended that the United States give firstconsideration to obtaining international agreement on an acceptable listof standardized airspace definitions keyed to an alphabetical identifierand should not proceed further with the airspace reclassification proposedin Notice No. 85-5 until such a consensus is reached by the VFOP. Also,AOPA stated, the FAA should achieve standardization, where possible, withthe Canadian airspace definitions. However, AOPA stated, the FAA shouldnot adopt an indentification for SUA similar to that implemented by Canada.Furthermore, AOPA commented, the elimination of existing airspace names,airspace subcategories, and airspace acronyms should be a product of anyreclassification effort if simplification is to be achieved. It is entirelytoo late, AOPA commented, for a unilateral U.S. implementation to haveany significant influence on the ICAO VFOP recommendations, and the proposal'sgoal of international commonality will be difficult to achieve. AOPA concludedthat there is no reason to go foward with rulemaking that does not contributeto that goal.An FAA representative, as a member of the VFOP, met with other VFOP membersin a working-group-of-the-whole conference in October 1985 and with thecomplete VFOP in July 1986 in Montreal. Also in attendance were the representativesof Canada, United Kingdom, Republic of Germany, Australia, New Zealand,France, U.S.S.R., and various representatives of international user organizations.Of concern to some of the members of the VFOP working group was the U.S.airspace classification proposal contained in Notice No. 85-5 and the adoptedCanadian airspace classification system. The concerns were for the UnitedStates and Canadian deviations from the VFOP's previously adopted airspaceclassification recommendations. The working group reviewed various recommendationsof individual members; however, it basically sustained the previously adoptedrecommendations. The VFOP's recommendations have been circularized as anofficial ICAO proposal to its various member states.The FAA reviewed the VFOP recommendations and recognized that its originalproposals would have to be modified in order to achieve the stated goalsof international airspace reclassification. The required modifications,as reflected in this notice, are relatively few and the FAA views themas being in the spirit of the NAR recommendations that precipitated theoriginal proposals.While one commenter believed that changing statute-mile measurements tonautical-mile measurements appeared to be a change for change's sake, AOPAand another commenter generally supported the aspects of the proposal tostandardize the dimensions of air traffic areas, control zones, and surfaceareas of ARSA's. AOPA's support was qualified, however, by the conditionthat the ceilings of these airspace areas would be established at 3,000feet above the surface. The FAA proposes to establish those ceilings at4,000 feet above the surface. Additionally, AOPA objected to the aspectsof the proposal which would change airspace lateral dimension descriptionsfrom statute miles to nautical miles because it believed the proposal wouldresult in an increase in the size of the affected airspace; e.g., an airtraffic area changing from a 5-statute-mile radius from the airport toa 5-nautical-mile radius would add airspace to that air traffic area. AOPArecommended that the FAA consider designating any future air traffic areawith a 4-nautical-mile radius which would represent only an 8 percent decreasein radius and 15 percent decrease in area size. AOPA also stated that itfavors using a 4-nautical-mile radius control zone for new locations andretention of existing control zone sizes except where significant advantagescan be shown to result from change.The FAA is convinced that safety is enhanced by standardization and isproposing to adopt the NAR recommendations to describe airspace assignmentsusing nautical-mile measurements. Accordingly, the FAA is proposing toconvert each control zone from statute-mile measurements to equivalentnautical-mile measurements; e.g., one statute mile would become .87 nauticalmile. Further, the FAA no longer believes that there is a need to universallydescribe a control zone in terms of a 5-mile radius. In some cases, thisairspace may be excessive, while in others it may be insufficient to containinstrument procedures.Adoption of the aspects of this proposal dealing with control zones wouldeventually lead to the elimination of control zones as an airspace classification.During the transition, prior to the elimination of control zones, the FAAwould promulgate rules at the regional level to describe control zonesin terms of required airspace. This procedure is consistent with the currentpractice of establishing and describing control zones.Further, this notice proposes to amend the operating rules of part 91 associatedwith operations in an air traffic area to specify the rules for operationswithin specific classes of airspace. The control zone(s) and surface areaassociated with each TCA and ARSA would be subjects of individual rulemakingactions designed to make those areas standard in size except as requiredby topography and local conditions. This is viewed as a transitional stepleading to the elimination of control zones as an airspace classification.Additionally, a control zone with an operating control tower, at locationsother than surface areas of TCA's or ARSA's, would be reclassified as ClassD airspace. For the most part, the operating requirements currently applicableto an airport traffic area would apply to Class D airspace. As a result,the term ``airport traffic area'' would become superfluous and is proposedto be eliminated. The two-way radio communications requirement for operationsto or from the primary airport is extended to include operations to orfrom a satellite airport. Control zones at locations without operatingcontrol towers would be reclassified as Class E airspace and the existingrules for operating in that airspace would effectively remain unchanged.Several commenters, including the National Business Aircraft Association(NBAA), endorsed the proposals. ALPA objected to the proposal on the groundsthat the proposed airspace reclassification would be as confusing as thecurrent system. ALPA's view was shared by another commenter who was ofthe opinion that the proposal, if adopted, would produce more confusionrather than simplification. Further, ALPA stated that the task group didnot make a specific recommendation urging the United States to reclassifyits airspace.The FAA recognizes that the NAR Task Group did not specifically urge theFAA to adopt their recommendations; however, the task group did recommendthe FAA pursue their recommendations in the light of the Canadian airspacereclassification and the work being done by the ICAO in the airspace classificationarea. Additionally, the FAA recognizes that there could be potential forconfusion if the reclassification were to be accomplished as presentedin the ANPRM's because of the significant differences in the ICAO and theCanadian approaches. As mentioned above, the FAA has modified the proposalsby aligning the airspace types with the ICAO approach.ALPA also commented that the classification of ARSA's remains unresolved.AOPA recommended in its comments that the FAA classify an ARSA as ClassC airspace. AOPA also suggested that the FAA specify that terminal radarservice areas (TRSA) would continue to exist only on an interim basis,until full implementation of the ARSA Program is achieved.Under this proposal, ARSA's would be reclassified as Class C airspace;however, each TRSA-to-ARSA conversion would be accomplished under separaterulemaking actions. Any remaining TRSA would be a candidate for disestablishment.ALPA commented that the ANPRM failed to indicate how the FAA would ensurethat all pilots would acquire the basic knowledge to operate safely ina reclassified airspace system. The Experimental Aircraft Association (EAA)commented that it was of the opinion that the airspace classification wouldbe a burden on pilots and flight schools but a boon to textbook and chartmakers.However, AOPA commented that it is convinced that implementation of a standardizedairspace classification could be in the best interest of all users of theNAS and that the incremental cost of implementing the proposal is insignificantwhen compared to the obvious benefits in reduced complexity. AOPA alsostated that the cost impact would be minimal to pilots and other aviation-relatedactivities as much of that reeducation would be accomplished by voluntaryefforts of the aviation press. AOPA encouraged the FAA to utilize safetyseminars, FAA General Aviation News, and direct mailings to describe anddetail the new airspace classification system to the active pilot population.In the event the FAA adopts the proposals contained in this notice, appropriateeducational efforts similar to those recommended by the AOPA would be completedprior to the effective date of any final rule dealing with the reclassificationof airspace. A draft implementation plan has been placed in Docket No.24456 and it addresses the principal areas upon which the FAA would concentrateits educational efforts.ALPA objected to the aspect of the proposal that would allow special VFR(SVFR) operations at some TCA locations where SVFR is currently prohibitedby andSection; 93.113. ALPA stated that if such a provision were to be adopted,then safety would be degraded.The regulation in part 93 that prohibits SVFR operations in specific controlzones is not proposed to be changed except for its incorporation into part91. SVFR operations would continue to be prohibited at those locationslisted in andSection; 93.113 if the proposals in this notice are adopted.EAA commented that the current plain language airspace description systemis a well understood system, and since English is the international aviationlanguage, the ICAO airspace classification system should be in plain English.Any airspace reclassification adopted in the United States would, of course,be based on the English language. While one of the goals of this noticeis to increase international commonality of classifications, ICAO rulesand conventions are not proposed nor established through this or any otherU.S. rulemaking proposal or action.EAA commented that it sees no benefit in allowing ultralight operationsabove 3,000 feet above the surface in what is control zone airspace underthe present airspace structure but what could be classified under the proposedairspace reclassification as ``general'' controlled airspace.The provisions of part 103 which restrict ultralight vehicle operationsin any TCA, ARSA, air traffic area, and PCA would remain in effect underboth proposals contained in Notice Nos. 85-4 and 85-5. This means that,under these proposals an ultralight vehicle could continue to operate abovethese airspace areas provided the airspace above the area is ``general''controlled airspace. The proposal in this notice regarding ultralightsmerely changes the language of part 103 to reflect the proposed new airspacedesignations. This notice does not propose to change the existing rulesfor operating ultralights except that which occurs due to the proposeduse of 4,000 feet above the surface as a ceiling for Classes D and E surfaceareas.EAA also suggested that the proposed distance from cloud minimums for operationsin TCA airspace (clear of clouds) would be feasible only if proposed ATCseparation standards were in effect in that airspace.The FAA has not proposed any new separation standards in Notice Nos. 85-4,85-5, or 85-15. Currently, ATC provides Stage III separation service inTCA's and is planning to continue to provide similar services in the reclassifiedTCA airspace.AOPA commented that the combining of air traffic areas, ARSA's, TRSA's,and control zones into Class C airspace would result in the FAA applyingthe more restrictive requirements of these types of airspace to the currentlyless restrictive airspace. For example, the communications requirementsassociated with an ARSA would also become associated with a simple airtraffic area or control zone.The proposals, if adopted as presented in the notices, would require apilot to establish and maintain two-way radio communications with ATC priorto operating in the reclassified airspace of an airport traffic area withan operating control tower regardless of the operation being planned orconducted in that airport traffic area.This aspect was explicitly recommended by the NAR Task Group. However,the FAA has modified its proposals concerning Class C airspace to classifyonly those control zones associated with ARSA's as Class C airspace becauseof the commonality of air traffic services provided in that airspace. Thismeans that if this proposal is adopted the lateral boundaries of the surfacearea of an ARSA, associated control zone, and associated air traffic areawould be reviewed and appropriately adjusted so that Class C airspace,which would replace these areas, would be represented on charts by a single``line.'' However, such actions would be accomplished under separate airspacerulemaking proposals. Further, other control zones currently associatedwith air traffic areas, but not associated with an ARSA or TCA, would becomeClass D airspace. As recommended by the NAR task group, the same two-wayradio communications requirement of proposed Class C airspace would applyto Class D airspace. The services presently provided in air traffic areaswould continue to be provided but within the entire Class D airspace area.AOPA stated that the FAA's discussion of SUA in the proposal was misleadingin regard to the statement that ``* * * ATC separation service is not providedbetween aircraft operating in SUA.''The FAA acknowledges that the statement was partially incorrect. Appropriateseparation in SUA would be provided for operations conducted under IFRin controlled airspace. However, ATC does not route nonparticipating IFRtraffic through an active SUA.AOPA commented that the proposal incorrectly implies that there is a furtherrequirement for a pilot to obtain an ATC authorization before overflyingan air traffic area.Since an overflight operation could be construed as an operation conductedabove an air traffic area, the statement in the proposal addressed by AOPAcould be misunderstood. Section 91.85(b) limits operations within an airtraffic area to those conducted to or from an airport in the air trafficarea; thus, any operation conducted through an air traffic area for anyother purpose, including transiting or ``overflights'' may be conductedonly under an ATC authorization.ALPA commented that the charting of a reclassified system would be a tremendousand costly undertaking which would take years to accomplish. The FAA doesnot agree with this assertion. The projected costs and implementation periodare discussed below in a summary of the draft regulatory evaluation andin more detail in the regulatory evaluation document contained in the docket.ALPA commented that it strongly supports the terminal airspace proposalscontained in Notice No. 85-4 as a positive step toward standardizationand simplification of the ATC system, except for the NAR recommendationto change the name of an air traffic area to control tower area. Statingthat while the recommended name change would be more indicative of thearea and its applicability, ALPA suggested that the change appears to bea change for change's sake and that it would involve considerable pilotreeducation. AOPA also objected to the proposed term ``control tower area,''as it believed that the resulting abbreviation, ``CTA,'' is in common useinternationally to represent a type of controlled airspace. However, EAAcommented that it supports the proposal to change the name of an air trafficarea to a control tower area.The FAA recognizes the potential for some confusion that would be associatedwith the abbreviation for the term ``control tower area'' (CTA) and theinternational abbreviation for the term ``control area'' (CTA). However,as stated previously, the FAA is proposing to eliminate the term ``airporttraffic area, '' and to reclassify such airspace according to the typeof airspace for which the airport qualifies. This notice does not proposeto adopt the term ``control tower area.''AOPA objected to the aspect of the proposals that would limit the applicationof the SVFR provisions of andSection; 91.107, when applied within the surfacearea of a TCA (Class B airspace), to the airspace below 3,000 feet abovethe surface within 5 miles of the primary airport. Instead AOPA suggestedthat SVFR operations should be authorized in Class B airspace within theentire surface area of the TCA up to 3,000 feet above the surface.The FAA agrees with the AOPA comment and has modified the proposal so thatSVFR operations could continue to be authorized by ATC in portions of thesurface areas of Class B, C, D, or E airspace as specified in an ATC clearance,provided SVFR operations are conducted utilizing the appropriate requiredequipment and are not prohibited by andSection; 93.113.AOPA objected to the proposed definition of SVFR referring to Class B,C, or D terminal airspace, and which, AOPA stated, implies that there isalso Classes B and C en route airspace. AOPA recommended that airspaceclass identifiers be constructed so as to eliminate the need to relateairspace to terminal or en route designations. AOPA also suggested thatthe NAR recommended changes to the VFR Minima tables in andSection;andSection;91.105 and 103.23 which associate the proposed Class B airspace cloud clearanceminima above and below 10,000 feet MSL with the terms ``en route'' or ``terminal,''are unnecessary. AOPA suggested that the FAA delineate the different minimaat 10,000 feet MSL and in this way serve the objective of simplificationand contribute to the achievement of commonality.Additionally, AOPA commented that while it generally supports the proposedpilot certification and qualification requirements for conducting operationsin a reclassified airspace system, it objected to the implication thatthe pilot qualification requirements for operations in Class C airspacewould only apply to operations in Class C terminal airspace. This implication,AOPA suggested, further implies that there is also en route Class C airspace.The FAA partially agrees with the AOPA comments and is proposing airspaceclassifications and associated VFR minima tables that refer only to theappropriate airspace classification and the differing requirements of ClassE airspace above and below 10,000 feet MSL. While Classes B, C, and D airspaceare inherently terminal airspace classifications, the terms ``en route''and ``terminal'' are not used to describe airspace in this proposal.AOPA commented that the current 5-mile visibility requirement for operationsconducted in controlled airspace above 10,000 feet MSL does not apply atand below 1,200 feet above the surface, and that Notice No. 85-5 woulddelete this exclusion. AOPA suggested that this exclusion be retained.The proposal in Notice No. 85-5 would simplify the visibility requirementsby associating them with operations in specific airspace classifications.The surface to 1,200 feet above the surface exclusion would not apply inproposed designations of Classes A, B, C, and D airspace in order to maintainuniformity of operations within those airspace areas. However, under theproposal in this notice the exclusion would continue to apply to ClassE airspace.AOPA objected to the different ceilings for the Class C airspace designationssuch as 4,000 feet above the surface for ARSA designations, and 3,000 feetfor the other Class C airspace designations that would replace the presentair traffic areas and control zones. Another commenter suggests that ARSA'sbe classified as Class C airspace and that the ceiling of all Class C airspacebe 3,000 feet above the surface.The FAA agrees that ARSA's should be classified as Class C airspace andthis proposal reflects that agreement. Additionally, for the sake of uniformityof airspace designations, the FAA is proposing that the ceilings of ClassesC, D, and E airspace areas that replace control zones be designated atthe MSL equivalent of 4,000 feet above the elevation of the airport forwhich the airspace is designated. In regard to a control zone for a TCAprimary airport, such airspace would be replaced with Class B airspacedesignated to the surface. However, the ceiling would be that which wasdesignated for the entire TCA.While, AOPA commented that it generally supports the criteria proposedin Notice No. 85-5 for selecting candidate locations for conversion fromClass C to Class B, it objects to the language in Notice No. 85-5 whichsuggests that the Department of Defense would provide the criteria formaking military airfields candidates for Class B airspace. AOPA suggestedthat the FAA establish, and make public, clear criteria based on operationsand other factors, against which military Classes B and C airspace designationscould be evaluated for implementation or continuation.While the FAA has published criteria for the establishment of an ARSA anda TCA, there are no plans to establish similar criteria for the classesof airspace. Under this proposal, any class of airspace could be designatedat a given location or area. For example, Class B airspace could be establishedin the en route structure and Class A airspace could be established ina terminal environment. However, in any case each such action would haveto be accomplished individually under the appropriate rulemaking procedures.AOPA commented that the floors of ``general controlled airspace,'' shouldbe made consistent with the floors of the similarly designated Canadianairspace by excluding the airspace below 3,000 feet above the surface exceptfor the airspace presently designated as control zones and transition areas.As discussed herein above, this aspect was addressed in Notice No. 88-2but dropped from the final rule and may be the subject of a separate proposalto follow this notice. For the purpose of the airspace reclassificationproposal, the FAA did not propose to establish a common base for controlledairspace as suggested by AOPA and as exists in Canada. Canada is currentlyreviewing its airspace structure including the established common baseof controlled airspace toward reaching commonality with the U.S. systemand ICAO planning.EAA suggested that the total number of TCA's be reduced by redesignatingsome TCA's as ARSA's. By doing this, EAA stated, pilots would benefit becausethere would no longer be a transponder requirement in the affected airspace.TCA's are established to provide more efficient control in terminal areaswhere there is a large volume of air traffic and where a high percentageof that traffic is large turbine-powered aircraft. Therefore, the eliminationof some TCA's would create a substantial adverse impact on the safe andefficient control of air traffic in those high volume terminal areas. Further,Amendment No. 91-203 requires the use of Mode C transponders in ARSA'sby December 31, 1990.The Department of the Navy, Office of the Chief of Naval Operations (CNO)commented that it had no objections to the proposed terms for use in describinginternational airspace designations for clarification purposes.However, the CNO did state that it would view any change to existing airspaceboundaries, regulatory altitudes, etc., as an FAA initiative to encroachupon airspace historically reserved for Department of Defense use.Under Executive Order (E.O.) 10854, the FAA may not designate controlledairspace in international airspace without first consulting with the Departmentsof State and Defense. While this proposal would not in itself enlarge controlledairspace outside of the United States, it would amend the regulations thatare used to establish/alter airspace descriptions over the high seas. However,the actual establishment or alteration of airspace that is under the auspicesof E.O. 10854 would only take place after appropriate consultation withthe Departments of State and Defense.ALPA commented that the NAR recommendations dealing with adopting the term``offshore control area,'' establishing a uniform base altitude for suchareas, and the naming of offshore control areas are practical and reasonableand suggested that the FAA further pursue the recommendations. ALPA suggestedthat the FAA await final disposition of the NAR recommendations dealingwith reclassifying the U.S. airspace structure until further considerationis given to including airspace designations outside the United States.However, AOPA suggested that the proposal be combined with the proposaldealing with U.S. airspace reclassification.In the interest of standardization and simplification, the FAA is proposingto reclassify airspace designations outside the United States as ClassE airspace except where otherwise designated, as in TCA's (Class B airspace),ARSA's (Class C airspace), and control zones with operating control towers(Class D airspace) that extend outside of U.S. airspace.The Air Transport Association (ATA) commented that it concurred with theproposals dealing with the designation of controlled airspace outside theUnited States provided there was no linking of andSection; 91.70 provisionswith the proposal. Currently andSection; 91.1 makes andSection; 91.70(c) applicableto U.S.-registered aircraft operations conducted in airspace outside theUnited States; i.e., indicated airspeeds greater than 200 knots are notpermitted in the airspace underlying a TCA. This notice does not proposeto modify the applicability of andSection; 91.70 to operations outside theU.S.The Air Traffic Control Association (ATCA) commented that it believes theproposal dealing with airspace designations outside the U.S. would enhancesafety by reducing the likelihood of misunderstanding and that costs shouldbe reduced by a resulting decrease in the amount of printed matter andrequired revisions. While stating that it believed that small businesses,non-profit organizations, or governmental jurisdictions would not be significantlyimpacted, ATCA was unsure of the cost impact on pilots and other relatedpersonnel. However, ATCA believes that such impacts could be minimizedif adequate advance notice of changes were given prior to implementation.The FAA will not implement any general reclassification of airspace untilit is convinced the using public and its own staffs are thoroughly familiarwith the changes.ATCA recommended that the FAA develop any required charting changes inconsultation with the affected users prior to issuing an NPRM.The FAA believes that changes to existing charting specifications willbe minimal and not of sufficient substance to warrant consultation withusers prior to issuing an NPRM. However, if the FAA subsequently findsit necessary to produce prototype charts containing such changes, thencopies would be made available for review and comment.<ITAG tagnum="84">Discussion of Pertinent NAR Recommendations</ITAG>The full text of the NAR recommendations germane to this proposal are containedin Notice Nos. 85-4, 85-5, and 85-15 as well as in the appropriate NARstaff studies. While review of these documents is not necessarily a prerequisitefor understanding the proposed rules contained in this notice, interestedparties may elect to review these relevant documents with this notice.A copy of each relevant staff study is in Docket No. 24456.<T3>NAR 1-5.2.1 and 1-5.2.2_Airspace Reclassification. </T3>The NAR TaskGroup recommended that the FAA consider reclassifying its airspace systemby either adopting the Canadian airspace classification system or one similarto it. The group suggested further that such consideration should be accomplishedunder the NAR with appropriate industry participation.The FAA accepted these recommendations by including them as topics of thesubtask groups under NAR Task Group 1-7.<T3>NAR 1-7.1.1 and 1-7.1.2_Airspace Reclassification. </T3>The NAR TaskGroup recommended that the FAA and NAR pursue an airspace reclassificationconcept and to utilize the airspace reclassification model developed byTask Group 1-7.1.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>Task Group 1-7.1's Recommended Airspace Classification Model,appears in Appendix B of Task Group 1-7.1 Staff Study and a copy of whichis in the public docket. For the purpose of this NPRM, the group's airspacemodel was utilized in developing Table 1_Airspace Classes.</ITAG>The FAA has accepted these recommendations by virtue of issuing NoticeNo. 85-5 and the proposals contained in this notice.<T3>NAR 1-7.2.2_TRSA Replacement. </T3>This recommendation would requirea pilot, operating an aircraft in the class of airspace adopted for ARSA'sthat had replaced TRSA's, to participate in the ATC services provided inthat class of airspace.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>While not established under any regulatory process, a TRSAgenerally consists of airspace already established under part 71 whereinthe FAA provides radar vectoring, sequencing, and separation on a full-timebasis to all aircraft operating under IFR and participating aircraft operatingunder VFR.</ITAG>The FAA has accepted this recommendation as an aspect of this proposal.<T3>NAR 1-7.2.4_SVFR Limits. </T3>This recommendation sought to keep theoperational provisions of SVFR as applicable in the class(es) of airspaceadopted for control zones. However, it would limit the application of SVFRto that airspace below 3,000 feet above the surface within a 5-mile radiusof the affected airport.Under this proposal all control zones would be replaced by Classes B, C,D, and E surface areas. Under procedures that would be developed for SVFR,a controller would limit the effectiveness of a SVFR clearance to thatairspace below 4,000 feet above the surface. For example: ``Cessna 234Vcleared out of Class B (or C, or D, or E) airspace 10 miles west, maintainspecial VFR at or below 2,500 feet, etc.'' The FAA has opted for 4,000feet above the surface versus 3,000 feet, as recommended by the task group,in order to promote standardization with the ceilings of ARSA's and withthe proposed vertical limit of the Class E surface area prohibition, belowwhich ultralight operations would have to be operated under an ATC authorization.Further, the FAA disagrees with the aspect of the NAR recommendation thatwould limit SVFR to that airspace within 5 miles of the airport. The FAAhas chosen to limit the effectiveness of SVFR to the lateral boundariesof the surface area as in most cases, this would be the point where a pilotwould likely encounter uncontrolled airspace and if improved meteorologicalconditions have not been encountered, the pilot could continue flight inthat airspace under the same meteorological conditions as authorized undera SVFR clearance. Also, many TCA's have surface areas that extend beyond5 miles. A mandatory SVFR clearance limit of 5 miles from the airport couldcreate situations whereby a pilot would reach 5 miles and not encountervisual meteorological conditions but would require an IFR ATC clearanceto proceed further or another SVFR clearance to return to the airport.The FAA believes it more efficient to allow the effectiveness of a SVFRclearance to extend to the boundaries of controlled surface area to enablea pilot to continue flight, if desired by the pilot and otherwise permittedby the rules.<T3>NAR 1-7.2.5_SVFR Definition. </T3>This recommendation would definethe term ``SVFR Conditions'' in the Pilot/Controller Glossary (Airman'sInformation Manual) and in part 1 of the FAR as weather conditions whichare less than basic VFR minima and in which some aircraft are permittedto operate under VFR.This recommendation is accepted and proposed in this notice.<T3>NAR 1-7.2.6_SVFR Definition. </T3>This recommendation would definethe term ``SVFR Operations'' in the Pilot/Controller Glossary (Airman'sInformation Manual) as any operation conducted under VFR, in SVFR conditions,in accordance with an ATC clearance issued in response to a pilot's requestto conduct such an operation.This recommendation is accepted and will be reflected in appropriate publicationsif the proposed rules in this notice are adopted and issued as final rules.<T3>NAR 1-7.2.7_Revise andSection; 91.107. </T3>This recommendation wouldrevise andSection; 91.107 to eliminate the term ``control zone.''This recommendation is proposed in this notice. The airspace of a controlzone, under this proposal, would be classified according to the specificsafety conditions, traffic density, and degree of ATC involvement neededto provide the appropriate level of safety in that airspace. Accordingly,the single term ``control zone'' would no longer be used in the FAR.<T3>NAR 1-7.2.8_Revise andSection; 103.17. </T3>This recommendation confirmsthe existing prohibition of ultralight operations in the classes of airspaceadopted for control zones, air traffic areas, ARSA's, PCA's, and TCA's.Effectively, this recommendation is accepted and the FAA proposes thatultralight operations would continue to be permitted in such airspace areasas they are under current rules. This notice proposes to amend andSection;103.17 to prohibit, unless otherwise authorized by ATC, ultralight operationsin Classes A, B, C and D, and below 4,000 feet above the surface in anyClass E airspace area that extends upward from the surface.<T3>NAR 1-7.2.9_Recommended VFR Minima. </T3>This recommendation proposesthat the VFR Minima tables in existing andSection;andSection; 91.105 and 103.23be revised to reflect a reclassified airspace system. Further, this recommendationwould, for operations conducted under VFR in Class B airspace, reduce theminimum distance from clouds that a pilot must currently maintain to thatof simply maintaining clear of clouds. However, the NAR Task Group recommendedthat the provisions of existing rules that contain exclusions to the basicVFR minima for helicopters <T3>not </T3>be amended.This recommendation is effectively accepted including the reduction ofcloud clearance minima for operations in a TCA (Class B airspace). TheFAA views the relaxation of minima as an enhancement to safety as it hasthe potential to reduce the number of times that pilots operating underVFR would have to alter course or assigned heading/route in order to remaina specific distance from clouds.<T3>NAR 1-7.3.1_Pilot Certification. </T3>The NAR Task Group recommendedthat the regulatory requirements for the present certification of student,private, instrument, commercial, and airline transport pilots be retainedwithin any reclassified airspace system.This recommendation is accepted and proposed in this notice.<T3>NAR 1-7.3.2_Pilot Qualifications for Operations in PCA's. </T3>Therecommendation confirms, as necessary, the existing requirements underandSection; 91.97 that operations conducted in the class of airspace adoptedfor PCA's, must be conducted under IFR.This recommendation is accepted and proposed in this notice.<T3>NAR 1-7.3.3_Pilot Requirements for Operations in TCA's. </T3>This recommendationwould reduce the existing minimum pilot qualifications for operations conductedunder VFR in any TCA to that of a student pilot certificate.This recommendation is effectively accepted but with certain conditions.These conditions are in accordance with the pilot qualification requirementsof a related action. Amendment Nos. 61-80, 71-11, and 91-205, establishedall TCA's as one type and allows certain, limited student pilot activityin a TCA. These amendments established that a student pilot certificatewill qualify such a pilot to receive authorization for flight through TCA's(proposed Class B airspace) or to or from most airports within the TCA's.However, student pilot operations to or from certain high traffic densityairports in certain TCA's will continue to be prohibited as is the caseunder the current rule. In any case, all student flight activity will berequired to be conducted under an appropriate logbook endorsement fromhis/her instructor, as well as under an ATC authorization.<T3>NAR 1-7.3.4_Pilot Qualifications for Operations in Control Zones (withoperating control towers,) ARSA's, and air traffic areas. </T3>This recommendationconfirmed the existing rules pertaining to the minimum pilot qualificationsfor operations in the classes of airspace adopted for ARSA's, air trafficareas, and control zones with operating control towers.This recommendation is accepted.<T3>NAR 1-7.3.5_Pilot Requirements for Operations in Other Designated ControlledAirspace. </T3>This recommendation confirmed the existing rules pertainingto pilot qualifications for operating in the class(es) of controlled airspaceadopted for airspace areas other than PCA's TCA's, ARSA's airport trafficareas, and control zones without operating control towers.This recommendation is accepted.<T3>NAR 1-7.3.6_Pilot Qualifications for Operations in Uncontrolled Airspace.</T3>This recommendation confirmed the existing rules pertaining to pilotqualifications for conducting operations in uncontrolled airspace.This recommendation is accepted.<T3>NAR 1-2.1.3_TCA Operating Requirements. </T3>The NAR Task Group recommendedthat the classification of TCA's, Group I and Group II, be eliminated andthat all such airspace classifications be designated as one class of terminalairspace with the following equipment and flight requirements:(a) A two-way radio capable of communicating with ATC on appropriate frequencies;(b) Except for helicopter operations, a VOR or TACAN receiver;(c) Except for helicopter operations conducted under a letter of agreementwith ATC, a 4096 code transponder with Mode C automatic altitude reportingequipment;(d) Except for student pilots with pilot logbook endorsement by a certifiedflight instructor that he/she has satisfactorily demonstrated ability tooperate in this class of airspace, a private pilot certificate would berequired as a minimum qualification;(e) Large turbine-engine powered airplane to or from a primary airportwould be required to operate at or above the designated floors while withinthe lateral limits of this class of airspace;(f) Operations conducted in the airspace underlying this class of airspacewould be limited to indicated airspeeds of 200 knots (230 mph) or less;and(g) Operations within this class of airspace may, if authorized or requiredby ATC, be conducted at indicated airspeeds greater than 250 knots (288mph);This recommendation is effectively adopted, in part, through other FAAinitiatives contained in Amendment Nos. 61-80, 71-11, 91-203, and 91-205.Amendment Nos. 61-80, 71-11 and 91-205, which were published as a singlerule, revised the classification and pilot and equipment requirements forconducting operations in TCA's. Specifically, that rule: (1) Establisheda single-class TCA; (2) required the pilot-in-command of a civil aircraftto hold at least a private pilot certificate, except for a student pilotwho has received certain documented training; and, (3) eliminated the helicopterexception from the minimum navigational equipment requirements. The provisionsof that rule are being phased in with the final provisions becoming effectiveJuly 1, 1989. Amendment No. 91-203 eliminated the helicopter exceptionto the transponder and Mode C requirements for operating in a TCA effectiveJuly 1, 1989. <T3>NAR 1-2.1.9_TCA Name. </T3>The NAR Task Group recommended that theterm ``Terminal Control Area'' and current definition be retained and associatedwith this class of airspace. In the interest of simplification of airspace terms and commonality withtrends in the international theatre, the FAA believes it inappropriateto retain airspace names as well as the proposed class designator. Therefore,this recommendation is not adopted. TCA airspace would be classified asClass B airspace under this proposal. <T3>NAR 1-2.3.1_Control Tower Area. </T3>The NAR Task Group recommendedthat the term ``airport traffic area'' or ``ATA'' be changed to ``controltower area.'' For the reasons stated for non-adoption of NAR Recommendation 1-2.1.9,this recommendation is also not adopted. The term ``airport traffic area''would be eliminated under this proposal and replaced with the appropriateairspace depending on the requirements within the airspace and the ATCservices available. <T3>NAR 1-2.3.2_Two-way Radio Communications Requirements in Airport TrafficAreas. </T3>The NAR Task Group recommended that the two-way radio communicationsrequirements for operations in the vicinity of an airport with an operatingcontrol tower be the same regardless of what entity operates the controltower. Furthermore, the NAR Task Group recommended amending andSection; 91.87of the FAR to clarify that pilots would be complying with the two-way communicationsrequirements by contacting the ATC facility responsible for the airspaceinvolved. This recommendation is accepted and proposed in this notice. <T3>NAR 1-2.3.4_Control Tower Area Definition. </T3>The NAR Task Grouprecommended that the definition of an airport traffic area (control towerarea) in part 1 of the FAR be amended to make the airport reference point(geographic position) identical to that of a control zone, and to definethe horizontal radius of that area as 5 nautical miles versus 5 statutemiles. This recommendation is not adopted. Airport traffic areas would be eliminatedand replaced by the appropriate class of airspace designator as discussedpreviously. <T3>NAR 1-2.3.5_Control Zone Airspace Limits. </T3>The recommendation wouldamend the definition of the term ``control zone'' in part 71 of the FARto make its ceiling identical to that of an airport traffic area and todefine that any horizontal radius used to describe a control zone to benormally 5 nautical miles versus normally 5 statute miles, and to requirethe use of nautical miles versus statute miles to describe any extensionto a control zone. This recommendation is not adopted. Under this proposal the term ``controlzone'' would be eliminated. Each Class C and D airspace surface area descriptionwould be described with a ``4,000-foot cap''; however, the cap would beexpressed as an equivalent MSL altitude. As stated previously, the MSLaltitude representative of 4,000 feet above the surface has been selectedfor the purpose of standardization and to continue to maintain the integrityof instrument operations in airspace that was originally designated toprotect such operations. Class B and Class E airspace surface areas wouldnot have a regulatory 4,000-foot cap. Instead, a Class B and E airspacesurface area would have an effective ``procedural cap'' at a relativelyequivalent altitude for the purposes of placing vertical limits on SVFRoperations for the specific airport. A Class E surface area would effectivelybe capped at 4,000 feet above the airport elevation through the proposedregulatory language for part 103 which would prohibit ultralight operationsbelow 4,000 feet above the surface in a Class E surface area within 5 milesof the airport. Additionally, each such airspace area would be expressedin nautical miles and reviewed as to whether its existing size should beincreased or decreased to reflect the actual airspace needed to encompassinstrument procedures. <T3>NAR 1-2.3.7_Nautical Miles Versus Statute Miles. </T3>The NAR TaskGroup recommended that for the sake of standardization and consistencyof aeronautical references, nautical miles (versus statute miles) be usedin Federal Airway, control zone, and transition area airspace descriptions. This recommendation is effectively accepted since under this proposal allairspace assignments in part 71 would be described with nautical-mile distances.<T3>NAR 2-3.1.13_Global Positioning System (GPS) Use In TAC's. </T3>TheNAR Task Group recommended that, following certification of GPS for useas a sole navigation aid, andSection; 91.90 be changed to allow its use inTCA's. This recommendation is not adopted. GPS is not anticipated to be certifiedfor use as a sole NAVAID within the NAS in the near future. Although thisrecommendation is not adopted, should GPS or any other navigation systembecome certified for sole use within the NAS, such system(s) would be incorporated,as appropriate, at that time. <T3>NAR 3-2.1.1_Offshore Airspace Nomenclature. </T3>This recommendationwould rename the airspace descriptions in part 71 of the FAR for ``additionalcontrol areas,'' designated in international airspace for which the UnitedStates has jurisdiction through ICAO regional agreement, as ``offshorecontrol areas.'' This recommendation is essentially accepted and airspace designations outsidethe United States would be classified as an appropriate class of airspaceas would be the domestic airspace. <T3>NAR 3-2.1.2_Offshore Control Area Uniform Base. </T3>The NAR Task Grouprecommended that offshore control areas have a uniform base of 1,200 feetabove the surface unless otherwise designated. This recommendation would be implemented to the extent possible. However,floors of designated airspace outside the United States would continueto be established in concert with the Department of Defense requirementsand in consultation with the Department of State. <T3>NAR 3-2.1.3_Offshore Control Area Identification. </T3>The NAR TaskGroup recommended that offshore control areas be identified only as namedareas, such as the current North Atlantic, Santa Barbara, etc., and thatnames of airspace descriptions such as Control 1142, Control 1154, Control1217, etc., would be retained only for airspace descriptions that functionas routes. This recommendation is accepted. However, FAA procedures for naming anairspace description such as Control 1142 would be reviewed in concertwith the ICAO-recommended practices for naming routes in offshore airspace.<T3>NAR 3-2.1.4_Offshore Airspace Classification. </T3>The NAR Task Grouprecommended that the offshore control areas be classified as Class A, B,C, D, etc., as appropriate.  This recommendation is accepted and proposed in this notice. With few exceptions,most of the airspace would be classified as Class E airspace.<ITAG tagnum="84">ICAO Considerations </ITAG>As part of this proposal relates to navigable airspace outside the UnitedStates, this notice is submitted in consonance with the ICAO InternationalStandards and Recommended Practices. Applicability of International Standards and Recommended Practices by theAir Traffic Operations Service, FAA, in areas outside domestic airspaceof the United States is governed by Article 12 and Annex 11, of the Conventionon International Civil Aviation, which pertains to the establishment ofair navigational facilities and services necessary to promoting the safe,orderly, and expeditious flow of civil air traffic. Their purpose is toensure that civil flying on international air routes is carried out underuniform conditions designed to improve the safety and efficiency of airoperations. The International Standards and Recommended Practices in Annex 11 applyin those parts of the airspace under the jurisdiction of a contractingstate, derived from ICAO, wherein air traffic services are provided andalso whenever a contracting state accepts the responsibility of providingair traffic services over high seas or in airspace of undetermined sovereignty.A contracting state accepting such responsibility may apply the InternationalStandards and Recommended Practices in a manner consistent with that adoptedfor airspace under its domestic jurisdiction. In accordance with Article 3 of the Convention on International Civil Aviation,(61 Stat. 1180), state aircraft are exempt from the provisions of Annex11 and its Standards and Recommended Practices. As a contracting state,the United States agreed by Article 3(d) that its state aircraft will beoperated in international airspace with due regard for the safety of civilaircraft. Since this action involves, in part, the designation of navigable airspaceoutside the United States, the Administrator is consulting with the Secretaryof State and the Secretary of Defense in accordance with the provisionsof Executive Order 10854. The Proposal The proposed amendments would, in part, classify all airspace by use ofa single alphabet character designation and thereby eliminate any needor reference to airspace assignments, except offshore control areas andSUA designations. Such changes are intended to achieve international commonalityof airspace classification and, to that end, are based on several previouslymentioned NAR recommendations as well as on the recommendations of theVFOP of the ICAO. The aspects of this proposal dealing with pilot certificationand the proposed amendments to Parts 71, 75, 101, 103, 105, 121, 127, 137,and 171 are generally of an editorial nature to integrate the proposedairspace class designators into the respective regulations dealing withairspace assignments and operating rules. Most of the proposed amendmentsto part 91 are generally editorial to accommodate the proposed airspacereclassification. However, there are new requirements included in thisproposal. It is of particular note that the requirements of andSection;andSection;91.70(c),91.85, 91.87, 91.88, and 91.89 would be put upon operators of U.S. civilaircraft when operating over the high seas. Appropriate notes are interspersedwith the actual proposed regulatory language to assist the reader in correlatingFAA's regarding for the proposed change. <ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Evaluation Summary </ITAG>Benefit-Cost Analysis The regulatory evaluation examines the costs and benefits of this NPRMto reclassify U.S. airspace. This proposed rule is intended to simplifyairspace designations, achieve international commonality of airspace designations,standardize equipment requirements and associate appropriate pilot certificationrequirements as well as certain other requirements associated with eachproposed airspace designation. These proposed changes are based primarilyon recommendations from a NAR Task Group and would ultimately allow forincreased safety and efficiency in the U.S. airspace and ATC system. Costs The FAA estimates the total incremental cost that would accrue from theimplementation of this proposed rule to be $1.6 million (discounted, in1986 dollars). Virtually all of the cost, which would be incurred by theFAA, would accrue from revisions to aeronautical charts, reeducation ofthe pilot community, and revision of air traffic controller training courses.Each one of these factors is briefly discussed below: 1. <T3>Revisions to Aeronautical Charts</T3>_Significant cost impact associatedwith this proposed rule would result from the requirement to change aeronauticalcharts. These modifications would be incorporated during the regular updatingand printing of the charts. Therefore, all costs associated with printingaeronautical charts are assumed to be normal costs of doing business. However,because of dimension and symbol changes which would be needed, the symbologyand depictions on the charts would need to be modified. This would requirechanges to the plates used to print the charts and would affect most ofthe aeronautical charts printed. The total cost of revisions to all ofthe charts is estimated by the National Oceanic Service based on the summationof the costs of revising each class of the airspace. The total discountedcost is estimated to be $1 million. 2. <T3>Revision of Air Traffic Training Courses</T3>_Manuals, textbooks, andother training materials used to educate FAA controllers would need tobe updated to reflect the airspace reclassification. According to the FAAAeronautical Center in Oklahoma City, lesson plans, visual aids, handouts,laboratory exercises, and tests would need to be revised. The cost of these revisions is determined by multiplying the total revisiontime by the hourly cost of the course manager making the changes. The coursemanagers are level GS-13 (step 5) employees with an average loaded annualsalary of $54,000. Assuming 2,080 hours per year, their average loadedhourly salary is $26. The cost of the course changes is estimated to be$31,000 (discounted). An additional cost of $8,000 (discounted) would accrueas the result of a one-week seminar and associated travel. This seminarwould be necessary to educate course managers about the airspace reclassification.The total cost that would accrue from this factor is estimated to be $39,000(discounted). 3. <T3>Reeducation of the Pilot Community</T3>_Pilots who are presently certificatedto operate in the U.S. airspace would need to become familiar with theairspace reclassification if this proposal is implemented. This would beaccomplished through a variety of publications, videotapes, and pilot meetings.The FAA is considering the production of a videotape that would be providedas a public service to industry associations such as AOPA, ALPA, and NBAAto inform them of the airspace reclassification. This videotape could beshown at various association meetings to help reeducate the pilot community.The FAA's Office of Public Affairs, estimates that the film would be 15minutes in length and could be produced at a cost of $17,000 (discounted).The FAA is also considering the publication of an Advisory Circular (ACdocumenting the new airspace classification. This AC would be mailed toeach registered pilot. It is estimated that one man-week at a level GS-14(Step 5) would be required to draft the AC and obtain approval in the sponsoringorganization, and one GS-14 man-week would be required to obtain FAA approvalof the AC. The cost associated with 2 man-weeks at a level GS-14 neededto prepare the AC is estimated to be $2,200 (discounted). This cost wasestimated using the average loaded hourly salary of a level GS-14 employeewhich is $31.After the AC is approved it would be mailed to approximately 761,000 registeredpilots. Assuming that the AC would be 10 pages in length and the cost ofreproduction is $0.05 per page, the cost of reproduction would be $335,000(discounted). Assuming that the shipping and handling charge associatedwith each copy is $0.25, the cost of shipping and handling is $168,000(discounted). The cost impact that would result from reeducating the pilotcommunity was estimated by summing the cost of the videotape and the AC,described in the preceding paragraphs. This estimated cost impact is $522,000(discounted).4. <T3>Equipage with Two-way Radio</T3>_The NPRM would require that aircraftoperators in control zones with operating control towers (Class D airspace)be capable of two-way radio communications. Currently, pilots operatingto or from an airport having a federally operated control tower must maintaintwo-way radio communications with the control tower. However, this is nota requirement at satellite airports or at airports with non-federally operatedtowers. According to NAR Task Group 1-2.3, this inconsistency causes confusionfor pilots. Thus the proposal includes the task group recommendation thattwo-way radio communications be required at all airports with control towers.According to the <T3>General Aviation Activity and Avionics Survey </T3>(December 1987),the aircraft not equipped with two-way radios are primarily operated forpersonal, aerial application, aerial observation, and other work use. Thesefour categories account for 133,366 of the 220,044 active general aviationfleet, or about 61 percent. The greatest number of these aircraft fallinto the personal use category. According to the survey, an estimated 90percent of personal use aircraft are equipped with two-way radios.It can be assumed that an estimated 10 percent which are not equipped withtwo-way radios are operating in airspace where this equipment is not required.Also, 70 percent of the aircraft used for aerial application are not equippedwith two-way radios. However, this change should not affect aerial applicationaircraft since the FAA plans to continue to authorize the operations inClass D airspace. Based on these assumptions and on the FAA's intentionto continue to authorize such aircraft operations at satellite airportsin Class D airspace without two-way radio requirements, this proposed changewould have no cost impact on the aviation community. BenefitsThis proposed rule is expected to generate benefits in the form of enhancedsafety and operational efficiency to the aviation community. These benefitsare briefly described, in qualitative terms, below.1. <T3>Increased Safety Due to Better Understanding and Simplification</T3>_TheFAA believes that the simplified classification in this proposal wouldreduce airspace complexity and thereby enhance safety. This proposed airspacereclassification mirrors the proposed ICAO airspace designations.This propopsal would increase safety in the United States since foreignpilots operating aircraft in U.S. airspace would be familiar with the airspacedesignations and classification system.Another simplification which would help to increase airspace safety isthe change that would correlate the class of controlled airspace currentlytermed a control zone to the airspace of the surrounding area. Presently,there are several types of designated airspace around an airport whichmakes it difficult for pilots and controllers to determine how the areasare classified and which requirements apply. After the reclassificationthe terminology would be more explanatory.The conversion of statute-mile designations to nautical mile designationsis intended to further simplify operations. Since the instruments on-boardthe aircraft are calibrated in nautical miles and aviation charts haverepresentations in nautical miles, this change would eliminate the needfor pilots to convert between nautical and statute miles. This simplificationwould help pilots and controllers to be better able to understand the airspacedesignations in part 71.2. <T3>Reduced Minimum Distance from Cloud Requirement_</T3>This proposedairspace reclassification would designate TCA's as Class B airspace. TheVFR minimum distance from clouds requirement in this airspace would alsochange. Currently this distance is 500 feet below, 1,000 feet above, and2,000 feet horizontal. In Class B airspace, it is proposed that this minimumdistance from clouds be ``clear of clouds.'' This change would afford VFRtraffic increased opportunities to fly in Class B airspace in more typesof weather than they currently have in a TCA. This would not be a threatto safety since all aircraft operating in Class B airspace are providedwith the appropriate separation.3. <T3>Operation of Ultralight Vehicles</T3>_This NPRM would require one operationalchange regarding ultralight vehicles. The proposal incorporates NAR TaskGroup 1-7.2's recommendation to change the regulation pertaining to operationsunder part 103 to reflect the airspace reclassification terminology andadds reference to 4,000 feet above the surface as the floor of such operationsover Class C, D, and E airspace surface areas. This is consistent withthe proposed revision to the current 3,000 feet above the surface ceilingof airport traffic areas (proposed Class D) and control zones (proposedClass E surface area).ConclusionDespite the fact that benefits are <T3>not </T3>quantifiable in monetary terms, the FAA, nonetheless, concludesthat the benefits of this proposal would outweigh its expected costs.The Regulatory Evaluation that has been placed in the docket contains additionalinformation related to the costs and benefits that are expected to accruefrom the implementation of this proposed rule.International Trade Impact StatementSince this proposal would not affect airspace outside of the jurisdictionor effective control of the United States, it would not impose any newoperating requirement in foreign or international airspace. As such, itwould have no affect on the sale of foreign aviation products or servicesin the United States, nor would it affect the sale of U.S. products orservices in foreign countries.Federalism Statement The regulations proposed herein would not have substantial direct effectson the states, on the relationship between the national government andthe states, or on the distribution of power and responsibilities amongthe various levels of government. Thus, in acccordance with Executive Order12612, it is determined that this proposal would not have sufficient federalismimplications to warrant the preparation of a Federalism Assessment.Regulatory Flexibility Determination The Regulatory Flexibility Act (RFA) of 1980 was enacted by Congress toensure that small entities are not unnecessarily and disproportionatelyburdened by government regulations. The RFA requires agencies to reviewrules which may have ``a significant economic impact on a substantial numberof small entities.'' The small entities which could be potentially affectedby the implementation of this notice are pilot schools (SIC 8299). Trainingmaterials used in the courses offered by the pilot schools would have tobe modified to reflect the changes of the airspace reclassification. However,it was determined the pilot schools would not incur any cost impact sincethe documents they use would be updated as a normal course of business.Thus, it has been determined that there would be no cost impact to thosepilot schools classified as small entities. Therefore, the FAA certifiesthat this proposed rule, if promulgated, would not have a significant costimpact on a substantial number of small entities.The FAA has determined that this proposed rule would not be a ``major rule''under E.O. 12291. The FAA has determined that this proposal is a ``significantregulation'' under Department of Transportation Regulatory Policies andProcedures (44 FR 11034; February 26, 1979).<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects</ITAG>14 CFR Part 1Air transportation.14 CFR Part 11Administrative practice and procedure, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.14 CFR Part 65Air traffic controllers, Aircraft, Airmen, Airports, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements.14 CFR Part 71Airspace, Navigation (air).14 CFR Part 75Airspace, Navigation (air).14 CFR Part 91Agriculture, Air traffic control, Aircraft, Airmen, Airports, Aviationsafety, Canada, Cuba, Freight, Mexico, Noise control, Political candidates,Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, Zimbabwa.14 CFR Part 93Air traffic control, Airports, Alaska, Navigation (air), Penalties, Reportingand recordkeeping requirements.14 CFR Part 101Aircraft, Aviation safety, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.14 CFR Part 103Aircraft, Aviation safety, Recreation and recreation areas.14 CFR Part 105Aircraft, Aviation safety, Recreation and recreation areas, Reporting andrecordkeeping requirements.14 CFR Part 121Air carriers, Aircraft, Airmen, Aviation safety, Charter flights, Drugtesting, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, Safety, Transportation.14 CFR Part 127Air carriers, Aircraft, Airmen, Aviation safety, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements.14 CFR Part 137Agriculture, Aircraft, Aviation safety.14 CFR Part 171Air traffic control, Navigation (air), Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.<ITAG tagnum="84">The Proposed Amendment</ITAG>For the reasons set out in the preamble, the FAA is proposing to amendparts 1, 11, 65, 71, 75, 91, 93, 101, 103, 105, 121, 127, 137, and 171of the Federal Aviation Regulations as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 1_DEFINITIONS OF ABBREVIATIONS</ITAG>1. The authority citation for part 1 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>49 U.S.C. 1347, 1348, 1354(a), 1357(d)(2), 1372, 1421through 1430, 1432, 1442, 1443, 1472, 1510, 1522, 1652(e), 1655(c), 1657(f);49 U.S.C. 106(g) (Revised Pub. L. 97-449, January 12, 1983).</ITAG>2. Section 1.1 would be amended by removing the definition ``airport trafficarea,'' revising the definition of ``controlled airspace,'' adding thedefinitions of ``uncontrolled airspace,'' and ``Special VFR conditions''in alphabetical order to read as follows:andSection; 1.1 General Definitions.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><T3>Controlled airspace </T3>means airspace designated as Class A, B, C,D, or E airspace in Part 71 of this chapter and within which all aircraftmay be subject to ATC.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><T3>Special VFR conditions </T3>mean meteorological conditions that areless than those required for basic VFR flight in controlled airspace andin which ATC may permit aircraft to operate for the purposes of departingfrom or arriving at an airport within controlled airspace.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><T3>Uncontrolled airspace </T3>means that portion of the navigable airspacewhich is not designated in part 71 as controlled airspace.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 11_GENERAL RULEMAKING PROCEDURES</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>3. The authority for Part 11 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>49 U.S.C. 1341(a), 1343(d), 1348, 1354(a), 1401 through1405, 1421 through 1431, 1481, 1502; 49 U.S.C. 106(g) (Revised Pub. L.97-449, January 12, 1983).</ITAG>4. Section 11.61 would be amended by revising (a)(1) and (c). The introductorytext of (a) is republished for the convenience of the reader.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 11.61</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope.</ITAG>(a) This subpart establishes procedures for initiating, processing, issuing,and publishing rules and orders issued under 307(a) of the Federal AviationAct of 1958 (49 U.S.C. 1348(a)), including_(1) Designations of controlled airspace under part 71 of this chapter;<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) For the purposes of this subpart, ``Director'' means the ExecutiveDirector for System Operations, the Associate Administrator for Air Trafficor, the Director, Air Traffic Operations Service or any person to whomthe Director as delegated authority in the matter concerned.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 65_CERTIFICATION: AIRMEN OTHER THAN FLIGHT CREWMEMBERS</ITAG>5. The authority for Part 65 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>49 U.S.C. 1354, 1355, 1421, 1422 and 1427; 49 U.S.C.106(g) (Revised Pub. L. 97-449, January 12, 1983).</ITAG>6. Section 65.37 would be amended by revising (f) introductory text and(f) (2) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 65.37</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Skill requirements: Operating positions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(f) Each of the following procedures that is applicable to that operatingposition and is required by the person performing the examination:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(2) The terrain features, visual checkpoints, and obstructions within thesurface area of controlled airspace designated for the airport.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 71_DESIGNATION OF FEDERAL AIRWAYS, AREA LOW ROUTES, CONTROLLEDAIRSPACE, AND REPORTING POINTS</ITAG>7. For a discussion of changes to Part 71, see the Supplementary Informationsection of this document.<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 75_ESTABLISHMENT OF JET ROUTES AND AREA HIGH ROUTES</ITAG>8. The authority for Part 75 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>49 U.S.C. 1348(a), 1354(a), 1510; Executive Order 10854;49 U.S.C. 106(g) (Revised Pub. L. 97-449, January 12, 1983); 14 CFR 11.69.</ITAG>9. Section 75.13 would be revised as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.13 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Area routes above 18,000 feet MSL.</ITAG>Each area route designated in Subpart D of this part consists of a directcourse for navigating aircraft at altitudes between 18,000 feet MSL andflight level 450, inclusive, between the waypoints specified for that route.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 91_GENERAL OPERATING AND FLIGHT RULES</ITAG>10. The authority for Part 91 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>49 U.S.C. 1301(7), 1303, 1344, 1348, 1352 through 1355,1401, 1421 (as amended by Pub. L. 100-223), 1422 through 1431, 1471, 1472,1502, 1510, 1522, and 2121 through 2125; Articles 12, 29, 31, and 32(a)of the Convention on International Civil Aviation (61 State 1180); 42 U.S.C.4321 et seq.; E.O. 11514; Pub. L. 100-202; 49 U.S.C. 106(g) (Revised Pub.L. 97-449, January 12, 1983).</ITAG>11. Section 91.1 would be amended by removing the reference to SpecialFederal Aviation Regulation No. 45-1 and revising 91.1 (a), (c) introductorytext and (c)(1) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 91.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability.</ITAG>(a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this section, thispart describes rules governing the operation of aircraft (other than mooredballoons, kites, unmanned rockets, and unmanned free balloons) within theUnited States, including the waters within 3 nautical miles of the U.S.coast.(b) Each person operating an aircraft in the airspace overlying the watersbetween 3 and 12 nautical miles from the coast of the United States shallcomply with Subpart A, 91.1 through 91.43, and Subpart B of this part.(c) Each person operating a civil aircraft of U.S. registry outside ofthe United States shall_(1) When over the high seas, comply with Annex 2 (Rules of the Air) tothe Convention on International Civil Aviation and with 91.70(c), 91.85,91.87, 91.88, and 91.89 of Subpart B;<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Note: Operations outside the U.S. within the vicinity of an airportwould be required to comply with the appropriate rules for such operations.</ITAG>12. Section 91.17(c)(4) would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 91.17 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Towing: gliders.</ITAG>(a) * * *(4) Before conducting any towing operation below 4,000 feet above the surfacewithin the lateral limits of the surface area of controlled airspace designatedfor an airport, or before making each towing flight with such airspaceif required by ATC, the pilot-in-command notifies the control tower. Ifa control tower does not exist or is not in operation, the pilot-in-commandmust notify the FAA flight service station serving that airspace beforeconducting any towing operations in that airspace.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>13. Section 91.24 would be amended by revising paragraphs (b) and (c) toread as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 91.24 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">ATC transponder and altitude reporting equipment and use</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) <T3>All airspace. </T3>No person may operate an aircraft in the airspacedescribed in paragraphs (b)(1) through (b)(5) of this section, unless thataircraft is equipped with an operable coded radar beacon transponder havingeither Mode 3A 4096 code capability, replying to Mode 3A interrogationswith the code specified by ATC and intermode and Mode S interrogationsin accordance with the applicable provisions specified in TSO C-112, andthat aircraft is equipped with automatic pressure altitude reporting equipmenthaving a Mode C capability that automatically replies to Mode C interrogationsby transmitting pressure altitude information in 100-foot increments. Thisrequirement applies_(1) <T3>All aircraft. </T3>In Class A and Class B airspace areas;(2) <T3>Effective July 1, 1989. </T3>All aircraft in all airspace within 30miles of an airport for which Class B airspace is designated (primary airport),from the surface upward to 10,000 feet MSL;(3) <T3>Effective July 1, 1989. </T3>Notwithstanding paragraph (b)(2) of thissection, any aircraft which was not originally certificated with an engine-drivenelectrical system or which has not subsequently been certified with sucha system installed, balloon or glider may conduct operations in the airspacewithin 30 miles of a Class B airspace primary airport provided such operationsare conducted_(i) Outside any Class B or Class A airspace area; and(ii) Below the altitude of the Class B airspace area ceiling or 10,000feet MSL, whichever is lower; and(4) <T3>Effective December 30, 1990. </T3>All aircraft_(i) In Class C airspace, and(ii) In all airspace above the ceiling and within the lateral boundariesof a Class C airspace area upward to 10,000 feet MSL; and(5) <T3>All aircraft except any aircraft which was not originally certificatedwith an engine-driven electrical system or which has not subsequently beencertified with such a system installed, balloon, or glider</T3>_(i) In all airspace of the 48 contiguous states and the District of Columbia:(A) <T3>Through June 30, 1989. </T3>Above 12,500 feet MSL and below the floorof a Class A airspace area, excluding the airspace at and below 2,500 feetabove the surface.(B) <T3>Effective July 1, 1989. </T3>At and above 10,000 feet MSL and belowthe floor of a Class A airspace area, excluding the airspace at and below2,500 feet above the surface; and(ii) <T3>Effective December 30, 1990. </T3>In the airspace from the surfaceto 10,000 feet MSL within a 10-mile radius of any airport listed in AppendixD of this part, excluding the airspace below 1,200 feet above the surfaceoutside of the area in which Class E airspace is designated to the surfacefor that airport.(c) <T3>Transponder-on operation. </T3>While in the airspace as specified inparagraph (b) of this section or in all controlled airspace, each personoperating an aircraft equipped with an operable ATC transponder maintainedin accordance with 91.172 of this part shall operate the transponder, includingaccordance with 91.172 of this part shall operate the transponder, includingMode C equipment if installed, and shall reply on the appropriate codeor as assigned by ATC.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>14. Section 91.43 would be amended by revising (c)(1)(i) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 91.43 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Special rules for foreign civil aircraft.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) * * *(1) * * *(i) Radio equipment allowing two-way radio communication with ATC whenit is operated in controlled airspace; and<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>15. Section 91.70 would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 91.70 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Aircraft speed.</ITAG>(a) Unless otherwise authorized by the Administrator (or ATC in the caseof operations in Class A or B airspace), no person may operate an aircraftbelow 10,000 feet MSL at an indicated airspeed of more than 250 knots (288mph).(b) Unless otherwise authorized or required by ATC, no person may operatean aircraft below 4,000 feet above the surface within Class A, B, C, orD airspace surface area at an indicated airspeed of more than_(1) In the case of reciprocating engine aircraft, 156 knots (180 mph);or(2) In the case of turbine-powered aircraft, 200 knots (230 mph).(c) No person may operate an aircraft through a VFR corridor designatedin Class B airspace, at an indicated airspeed of more than 200 knots (230mph). (d) If the minimum safe aircraft speed for any particular operation isgreater than the maximum speed prescribed in this section, the aircraftmay be operated at that minimum speed. 16. Section 91.71 would be amended by revising (c), (d), and (e) and byadding (f) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;91.71</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Acrobatic flight. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) Below 4,000 feet above the surface within the lateral limits of thesurface area of controlled airspace designated for an airport; (d) Within 4 nautical miles of the center line of any Federal airway; (e) Below an altitude of 1,500 feet above the surface; or (f) When flight visibility is less than 3 statute miles. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>17. Section 91.75 would be amended by revising paragraph (a) to read asfollows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;91.75</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Compliance with ATC clearances and instructions. </ITAG>(a) When an ATC clearance has been obtained, a pilot-in-command may notdeviate from that clearance, except in an emergency, unless that pilotobtains an amended clearance. However, except in Class A airspace, thisparagraph does not prohibit that pilot from canceling an IFR flight planif the operation is being conducted in VFR weather conditions. When a pilotis uncertain of an ATC clearance, that pilot shall immediately requestclarification from ATC. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>18. Section 91.85 would be revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;91.85</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Operating on or in the vicinity of an airport. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> Unless otherwise required by part 93 of this chapteror unless otherwise authorized or required by ATC, each person operatingan aircraft on or in the vicinity of an airport shall comply with the requirementsof this section and the applicable requirements of this part for operatingin specific classes of airspace. (b) <T3>Flap settings.</T3> Except when necessary for training or certification,the pilot-in-command of a civil turbojet-powered aircraft shall use, asa final landing flap setting, the minimum certificated landing flap settingset forth in the approved performance information in the Airplane FlightManual for the applicable conditions. However, each pilot-in-command hasthe final authority and responsibility for the safe operation of his airplane,and may use a different flap setting for that airplane if he determinesthat it is necessary in the interest of safety. (c) <T3>Minimum altitudes.</T3> Each pilot of a large or turbine-powered airplaneshall: (1) Unless otherwise required by the applicable distance from cloud criteria,enter the traffic pattern at an altitude of at least 1,500 feet above theelevation of the airport and maintain at least 1,500 feet until furtherdescent is required for a safe landing; (2) When approaching to land on a runway served by an instrument landingsystem (ILS), shall, if the airplane is ILS-equipped, fly that airplaneat an altitude at or above the glide slope between the outer marker (orpoint of interception of glide slope, of compliance with the applicabledistance from clouds criteria requires interception closer in) and themiddle marker; and (3) When operating an airplane approaching to land on a runway served bya visual approach slope indicator, maintain an altitude at or above theglide slope until a lower altitude is necessary for a safe landing. Paragraphs(c)(2) and (c)(3) of this section do not prohibit normal bracketing maneuversabove or below the glide slope that are conducted for the purpose of remainingon the glide slope. (d) <T3>Direction of turns.</T3> When approaching to land at an: (1) <T3>Airport with an operating control tower,</T3> except when conductinga circling approach under part 97 of this chapter, each pilot of an airplane,shall circle the airport to the left. (2) <T3>Airport without an operating control tower,</T3> each pilot of an airplane,shall make all turns of that airplane to the left unless the airport displaysapproved light signals or visual markings indicating that turns shouldbe made to the right, in which case the pilot shall make all turns to theright. (3) <T3>Any airport,</T3> each pilot of a helicopter shall avoid the flow offixed-wing aircraft. (e) <T3>Takeoffs.</T3> Each person departing from an airport in: (1) <T3>Any aircraft,</T3> shall comply with the departure traffic patternor departure procedure prescribed for that airport. (2) <T3>A turbine-powered aircraft,</T3> shall, unless otherwise required bythe prescribed departure procedure for that airport or the applicable distancefrom clouds criteria, climb to an altitude of 1,500 feet above the surfaceas rapidly as practicable. (f) <T3>Takeoff, landing, taxi clearance.</T3> No person may, at any airportwith an operating control tower, operate an aircraft on a runway or taxiway,or takeoff or land an aircraft, unless an appropriate clearance is receivedfrom ATC. A clearance to ``taxi to'' the takeoff runway assigned to theaircraft is not a clearance to cross that assigned takeoff runway, or totaxi on that runway at any point, but is a clearance to cross other runwaysthat intersect the taxi route to that assigned takeoff runway. A clearanceto ``taxi to'' any point other than an assigned takeoff runway is a clearanceto cross all runways that intersect the taxi route to that point. (g) <T3>Noise abatement.</T3> Where a formal runway use program has been establishedby the FAA, each pilot of a large or turbine-powered airplane assigneda noise abatement runway by ATC, shall use that runway. However, consistentwith the final authority of the pilot-in-command concerning the safe operationof the aircraft as prescribed in andSection;91.3(a), ATC may assign a differentrunway if requested by the pilot in the interest of safety. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;91.87</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>19. Section 91.87 would be removed. 20. Section 91.88 would be revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;91.88</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Operations in Class C or D airspace. </ITAG>(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this section, each aircraftoperation in Class C or D airspace shall be conducted in compliance withthe following two-way radio communications requirements: (1) <T3>Arrival or through flight,</T3> establish two-way radio communicationswith the ATC facility (including foreign ATC in the case of airspace designatedin the U.S. for a non-U.S. airport) providing air traffic services priorto entering that airspace and thereafter maintain those communicationswhile within that airspace. (2) <T3>Departing flight, </T3>establish and maintain two-way radio communicationswith ATC prior to departing an airport within Class C and D airspace, exceptthat for aircraft departing a satellite airport, two-way radio communicationsshall be established as soon as practicable after departing that satelliteairport.(b) An operator may deviate from any provision of this section under theprovisions of an ATC authorization issued by the ATC facility having jurisdictionof the airspace concerned. ATC may authorize a deviation on a continuingbasis or for an individual flight, as appropriate. (c) Unless otherwise authorized by ATC, no person may operate an aircraftwithin a Class C airspace area unless that aircraft is equipped with theapplicable equipment specified in andSection; 91.24.21. Section 91.89 would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 91.89 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Operations in Class A airspace</ITAG>Each person operating an aircraft in Class A airspace shall conduct thatoperation under IFR and in compliance with the following:(a) <T3>Clearance. </T3>Operations may be conducted only under an ATC clearancereceived prior to entering the airspace.(b) <T3>Communications. </T3>Unless otherwise authorized by ATC, each aircraftoperating in Class A airspace shall be equipped with a two-way radio capableof communicating with ATC on a frequency assigned by ATC. Each pilot shallmaintain two-way radio communications with ATC while operating in ClassA airspace.(c) <T3>Transponder requirement. </T3>Unless otherwise authorized by ATC, noperson may operate an aircraft within a Class B airspace area unless thataircraft is equipped with the applicable equipment specified in andSection;91.24.(d) <T3>ATC authorizations. </T3>An operator may deviate from any provisionof this section under the provisions of an ATC authorization issued bythe ATC facility having jurisdiction of the airspace concerned. Requestsfor deviation from any provision of this section other than paragraph (c)of this section must be submitted in writing, at least 4 days before theproposed operation. ATC may authorize a deviation on a continuing basisor for an individual flight, as appropriate.22. Section 91.90 would be revised as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 91.90 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Operations in Class B airspace.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Operating rules. </T3>No person may operate an aircraft within a ClassB airspace area designated in part 71 of this chapter except in compliancewith the following rules:(1) The operator must receive an ATC authorization prior to operation ofthe aircraft in that area.(2) Unless otherwise authorized by ATC, each person operating a large turbineengine-powered airplane to or from a primary airport shall operate at orabove the designated floors of the Class B airspace area while within thelateral limits of that area.(3) Any person conducting pilot training operations at an airport withina Class B airspace area shall comply with any procedures established byATC for such operations in that area.(b) <T3>Pilot requirements. </T3>(1) No person may take off or land a civilaircraft at an airport within a Class B airspace area or operate a civilaircraft within a Class B airspace area unless:(i) The pilot-in-command holds at least a private pilot certificate; or(ii) The aircraft is operated by a student pilot who has met the requirementsof andSection; 61.95 of this chapter.(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (b)(1)(ii) of this section,no person may take off or land a civil aircraft at those airports listedin section 4 of Appendix D of this part unless the pilot-in-command holdsat least a private pilot certificate.(c) <T3>Communications and navigation equipment requirements. </T3>Unless otherwiseauthorized by ATC, no person may operate an aircraft within a Class B airspacearea unless that aircraft is equipped with_(1) An operable VOR or TACAN receiver (except for helicopter operationsprior to July 1, 1989); and(2) An operable two-way radio capable of communications with ATC on appropriatefrequencies for that Class B airspace area.(d) <T3>Transponder requirement. </T3>Unless otherwise authorized by ATC, noperson may operate an aircraft in a Class B airspace area unless the aircraftis equipped with the applicable operating transponder and automatic altitudereporting equipment specified in paragraph (a) of andSection; 91.24, exceptas provided in paragraph (d) of that section.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 91.97 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>23. Section 91.97 would be removed.24. Section 91.105 would be amended by revising (a) and (b) to read asfollows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;91.105  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Basic VFR weather minimums.  </ITAG>(a) Except as provided in andSection;andSection;91.105(b) and 91.107, no personmay operate an aircraft under VFR when the flight visibility is less than,or at a distance from clouds that is less than that prescribed for thecorresponding altitude and class of airspace in the following table:  <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s10,r100,xl100  </C>   <H1>Airspace class  </H1><H1>Flight visibility  </H1><H1>Distance from clouds </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Class A  <D>Not applicable  </D><D>Not applicable.   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Class B  <D>3 statute miles  </D><D>Clear of clouds.   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Class C  <D>3 statute miles  </D><D>500 feet below,  </D><P>1,000 feet above, </P><P>2,000 feet horizontal.   </P></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Class D  <D>3 statute miles  </D><D>500 feet below,  </D><P>1,000 feet above,  </P><P>2,000 feet horizontal.   </P></ITAG>Class E:  <ITAG tagnum="3">below 10,000 feet MSL.  </ITAG><D>3 statute miles  </D><D>500 feet below,  </D><P>1,000 feet above,  </P><P>2,000 feet horizontal.   </P>Class E:  <ITAG tagnum="3">at 10,000 feet MSL, and above.  </ITAG><D>5 statute miles  </D><D>1,000 feet below,  </D><P>1,000 feet above,  </P><P>1 mile horizontal.   </P>Class G:  <ITAG tagnum="3">Day  </ITAG><D>1 statute mile  </D><D>Clear of clouds.   </D><ITAG tagnum="3">Night  </ITAG><D>3 statute miles  </D><D>500 feet below,  </D><P>1,000 feet above,  </P><P>2,000 feet horizontal.   </P><ITAG tagnum="3">Day and night: Except as provided by andSection;91.105(b)  </ITAG></ITAG>  (b) <T3>Class G. Airspace. </T3>Nothwithstanding the provisions of paragraph(a) of this section the following operations may be conducted in ClassG airspace at and below 1,200 feet above the surface:  (1) <T3>Helicopter</T3>. When the visibility is less than 1 mile during dayhours or less than 3 miles during night hours, a helicopter may be operatedclear of clouds if operated at a speed that allows the pilot adequate opportunityto see any air traffic or obstruction in time to avoid a collision.  (2) <T3>Airplane. </T3>When the visibility is less than 3 miles but greaterthan 1 mile during night hours, an airplane may be operated clear of cloudsif operated in an airport traffic pattern within one-half mile of the runway. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *  </ITAG>25. Section 91.107 would be revised to read as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;91.107  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Special VFR weather minimums.  </ITAG>Except as provided in Appendix D of this part, the following special weatherminimums and requirements apply to operations conducted to or from an airportin controlled airspace:  (a) Operations may be conducted only under an ATC clearance_  (1) Within the lateral limits of controlled airspace designated to thesurface; and  (2) Except for helicopters, between sunrise and sunset (or in Alaska, whenthe sun is 6anddegrees; or more above the horizon) unless:  (i) That person meets the applicable requirements for instrument flightunder Part 61 of this chapter; and  (ii) The aircraft is equipped as required in andSection;91.33(d).  (b) Operations may only be conducted clear of clouds.  (c) Except for helicopters, operations may be conducted only when flightvisibility is at least 1 statute mile.  (d) No person may take off or land an aircraft (other than a helicopter)_ (1) Unless ground visibility is at least 1 statute mile; or  (2) If ground visibility is not reported, unless flight visibility duringlanding and takeoff is at least 1 statute mile.  26. Appendix D of part 91 would be revised to read as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix D_Airports/Locations: Special Operating Restrictions  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Section 1.</T3> Locations at which the requirements of andSection;91.24(b)(2)apply. The requirements of andSection;91.24(b)(2) apply below 10,000 feetabove the surface within a 30-nautical-mile radius of each location inthe following list:  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Atlanta, GA (The William B. Hartsfield Atlanta International Airport) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Boston, MA (General Edward Lawrence Logan International Airport) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Chicago, IL (Chicago-O'Hare International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Cleveland, OH (Cleveland-Hopkins International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Dallas, TX (Dallas/Fort Worth Regional Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Denver, CO (Stapleton International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Detroit, MI (Metropolitan Wayne County Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Honolulu, HI (Honolulu International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Houston, TX (Houston Intercontinental Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Kansas City, KS (Mid-Continent International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Las Vegas, NV (McCarran International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Los Angeles, CA (Los Angeles International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Miami, FL (Miami International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Minneapolis, MN (Minneapolis-St. Paul International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Newark, NJ (Newark International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">New Orleans, LA (New Orleans International Airport-Moisant Field) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">New York, NY (John F. Kennedy International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">New York, NY (LaGuardia Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Philadelphia, PA (Philadelphia International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Pittsburgh, PA (Greater Pittsburgh International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">San Diego, CA (San Diego International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">San Francisco, CA (San Francisco International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Seattle, WA (Seattle-Tacoma International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">St. Louis, MO (Lambert-St. Louis International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Washington, DC (Washington National Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Section 2. </T3>Airports at which the requirements of andSection;91.24(b)(5)(ii)apply. The requirements of andSection;91.24(b)(5)(ii) apply to operationsin the vicinity of each of the following airports: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Logan International Airport, Billings, MT.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Hector International Airport, Fargo, ND.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Section 3. </T3>Locations at which special VFR is not authorized. Thespecial VFR weather minimums of andSection;91.107 do not apply for the followingairports:  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Atlanta, GA (The William B. Hartsfield Atlanta International Airport) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Baltimore, MD (Baltimore/Washington International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Boston, MA (General Edward Lawrence Logan International Airport) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Buffalo, NY (Greater Buffalo International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Chicago, IL (Chicago-O'Hare International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Cleveland, OH (Cleveland-Hopkins International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Columbus, OH (Port Columbus International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Covington, KY (Greater Cincinnati International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Dallas, TX (Dallas/Fort Worth Regional Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Dallas, TX (Love Field)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Denver, CO (Stapleton International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Detroit, MI (Metropolitan Wayne County Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Honolulu, HI (Honolulu International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Houston, TX (Houston Interncontinental Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Indianapolis, IN (Indianapolis International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Los Angeles, CA (Los Angeles International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Louisville, KY (Standiford Field)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Memphis, TN (Memphis International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Miami, FL (Miami International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Minneapolis, MN (Minneapolis-St. Paul International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Newark, NJ (Newark International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">New York, NY (John F. Kennedy International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">New York, NY (LaGuardia Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">New Orleans, LA (New Orleans International Airport, Moisant Field) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Philadelphia, PA (Philadelphia International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Pittsburgh, PA (Greater Pittsburgh International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Portland, OR (Portland International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">San Francisco, CA (San Francisco International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Seattle, WA (Seattle-Tacoma International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">St. Louis, MO (Lambert-St. Louis International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Tampa, FL (Tampa International Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Washington, DC (Washington National Airport)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Section 4.</T3> Locations at which solo student pilot activity is notpermitted. Pursuant to andSection; 91.87(b), solo student pilot operationsare not permitted at any of the following airports.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Atlanta, GA (The William B. Hartsfield Atlanta International Airport)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Boston, MA (General Edward Lawrence Logan International Airport)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Chicago, IL (Chicago-O'Hare International Airport)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Dallas, TX (Dallas/Fort Worth Regional Airport)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Los Angeles, CA (Los Angeles International Airport)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Miami, FL (Miami International Airport)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Newark, NJ (Newark International Airport)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">New York, NY (John F. Kennedy International Airport)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">New York, NY (LaGuardia Airport)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">San Francisco, CA (San Francisco International Airport)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Washington, DC (Washington National Airport)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Andrews Air Force Base, MD</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 93_SPECIAL AIR TRAFFIC RULES AND AIRPORT TRAFFIC PATTERNS</ITAG>27. The authority for part 93 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 49 U.S.C. 1302, 1303, 1348, 1354(a), 1421(a), 1424,the Metropolitan Washington Airports Act of 1986, Pub. L. 99-500; 49 U.S.C.106(g) (Revised Pub. L. 97-449, January 12, 1983).</ITAG>28. Part 93 would be amended by removing subparts I and Q entirely.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note:</T4> Subpart Q would be removed and the special rules associatedwith the airports at Abbotsford, BC, and Sault St. Marie, ON, would nolonger be needed as these rules would be codified into proposed andSection;91.88.</ITAG>29. Section 93.151 would be amended by revising the introductory text toread as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 93.151</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability.</ITAG>This subpart prescribes special air traffic rules and communications requirementsfor persons operating aircraft, under VFR, below 3,000 feet within thelateral limits of the surface area of controlled airspace designated forKetchikan International Airport, Alaska, excluding that airspace below600 feet MSL and_<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 101_MOORED BALLOONS, KITES, UNMANNED ROCKETS AND UNMANNED FREEBALLOONS</ITAG>30. The authority for part 101 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 49 U.S.C. 1301(7), 1303, 1344, 1348, 1352 through 1355,1401, 1421 (as amended by Pub. L. 100-223), 1422 through 1431, 1471, 1472,1502, 1510, 1522, and 2121 through 2125; Articles 12, 29, 31, and 32(a)of the Convention on International Civil Aviation (61 Stat. 1180); 42 U.S.C.4321 et seq.; E.O. 11514; Pub. L. 100-202; 49 U.S.C. 106(g) (Revised Pub.L. 97-449, January 12, 1983).</ITAG>31. Section 101.33 would be amended by revising paragraph (a) to read asfollows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 101.33</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Operating limitations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(a) Unless otherwise authorized by ATC, below 2,000 feet above the surfaceof a Class D airspace or within the lateral limits of a Class E airspacesurface area;<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 103_ULTRALIGHT VEHICLES</ITAG>32. The authority for part 103 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 49 U.S.C. 1348, 1354(a), 1421(a), 1422 and 1433; 49U.S.C. 106(g) (Revised Pub. L. 97-449, January 12, 1983).</ITAG>33. The reference to Special Federal Aviation Regulation No. 45-1 wouldbe removed.34. Section 103.17 would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.17</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Operations in certain airspace.</ITAG>No person may operate an ultralight vehicle within Class A, B, C, or Dairspace or below 4,000 feet above the surface within the lateral limitsof a Class E surface area unless that person has prior authorization fromthe ATC facility having jurisdiction over that airspace.35. Section 103.23 would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.23 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Flight visibility and cloud clearance requirements.</ITAG>No person may operate an ultralight vehicle when the flight visibilityor distance from clouds is less than that in the following table, as appropriate:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s100,r100,xl100</C> <H1>Airspace class</H1><H1>Flight visibility</H1><H1>Distance from clouds</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Class A <D>Not applicable </D><D>Not applicable.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Class B <D>3 statute miles </D><D>Clear of clouds.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Class C <D>3 statute miles </D><D>500 feet below,</D><P>1,000 feet above,</P><P>2,000 feet horizontal.</P></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Class D <D>3 statute miles </D><D>500 feet below,</D><P>1,000 feet above,</P><P>2,000 feet horizontal.</P></ITAG>Class E:<ITAG tagnum="3">Below 10,000 feet MSL </ITAG><D>3 statute miles </D><D>500 feet below,</D><P>1,000 feet above,</P><P>2,000 feet horizontal.</P>Class E:<ITAG tagnum="3">At 10,000 feet MSL, and above </ITAG><D>5 statute miles </D><D>1,000 feet below,</D><P>1,000 feet above,</P><P>1 mile horizontal.</P><ITAG tagnum="1">Class G <D>1 statute mile </D><D>Clear of clouds.</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 105_PARACHUTE JUMPING</ITAG>36. The authority for Part 105 would continue to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 49 U.S.C. 1348, 1354, and 1421; 49 U.S.C. 106(g) (RevisedPub. L. 97-449, January 12, 1983).</ITAG>37. The reference to Special Federal Aviation Regulation No. 45-1 wouldbe removed.38. Section 105.19 would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 105.19</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Jumps in or into Class A, B, C, and D airspace.</ITAG>(a) No person may make a parachute jump, and no pilot-in-command may allowa parachute jump to be made from that aircraft, in or into Class A, B,C, and D airspace, without, or in violation of, the terms of an ATC authorizationissued under this section.(b) Each request for an authorization under this section must be submittedto the nearest FAA air traffic control facility or FAA flight service stationand must include the information prescribed by andSection; 105.25(a).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 105.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>39. Section 105.20 would be removed.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 105.21</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>40. Section 105.21 would be removed.<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 121_CERTIFICATION AND OPERATIONS: DOMESTIC, FLAG, AND SUPPLEMENTALAIR CARRIERS AND COMMERCIAL OPERATORS OF LARGE AIRCRAFT</ITAG>41. The authority for part 121 continues to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>49 U.S.C. 1354(a), 1355, 1356, 1357, 1401, 1421 through1430, 1472, 1485 and 1502; 49 U.S.C. 106(g) (Revised Pub. L. 97-449, January12, 1983). </ITAG>42. Section 121.347 would be amended by revising (a) introductory textand (a)(2) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 121.347 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Radio equipment for operations under VFR over routes navigated bypilotage. </ITAG>(a) No person may operate an aircraft under VFR over routes that can benavigated by pilotage, unless it is equipped with the radio equipment necessaryunder normal operating conditions to fulfill the following: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(2) Communicate with appropriate traffic control facilities from any pointwithin the lateral limits of controlled airspace designated to the surfacewithin which flights are intended. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>43. Section 121.649 would be amended by revising (c) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;121.649 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Takeoff and landing weather minimums: VFR: Domestic air carriers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) The weather minimums in this section do not apply to the VFR operationof fixed-wing aircraft at any of the locations where the special weatherminimums of 14 CFR 91.107 are not applicable (See Appendix D of 14 CFRpart 91). The basic VFR weather minimums of 14 CFR 91.105 apply at thoselocations. <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 127_CERTIFICATION AND OPERATIONS OF SCHEDULED AIR CARRIERS WITHHELICOPTERS </ITAG>44. The authority for part 127 continues to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>49 U.S.C. 1354(a), 1421, 1422, 1423, 1424, 1425, and1430; 49 U.S.C. 106(g) (Revised Pub. L. 97-449, January 12, 1983). </ITAG>45. Section 127.125 would be amended by revising (b). The introductorytext of the section is republished for the convenience of the reader toread as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 127.125 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Radio equipment for operations over routes navigated by pilotage.</ITAG>No person may operate a helicopter over a route that can be navigated bypilotage, unless the helicopter is equipped with the radio equipment neededto perform the following functions under normal operating conditions. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) Communicate with ATC towers from any point within the lateral limitsof controlled airspace designated to the surface within which flights areintended. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 137_AGRICULTURAL AIRCRAFT OPERATIONS</ITAG>46. The authority for Part 137 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 49 U.S.C. 1348(c), 1354(a), 1421 and 1427; 49 U.S.C.106(g) (Revised Pub. L. 97-449, January 12, 1983).</ITAG>47. Section 137.43 would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 137.43 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Operations in Class D and E airspace.</ITAG>(a) Except for flights to and from a dispensing area, no person may operatean aircraft within Class D airspace unless authorization for that operationhas been obtained from the control tower concerned.(b) No person may operate an aircraft in weather conditions below VFR minimumswithin Class D airspace or within the lateral limits of a Class E airspacearea designated to the surface unless authorization for that operationhas been obtained from the appropriate ATC facility.(c) Notwithstanding andSection; 91.107(a)(2) of this chapter, an aircraftmay be operated under the special VFR weather minimums without meetingthe requirements prescribed therein.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 171_NON-FEDERAL NAVIGATION FACILITIES</ITAG>48. The authority for part 171 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 49 U.S.C. 1343, 1346, 1348, 1354(a), 1355, 1401, 1421(as amended by Pub. L. 100-223), 1422 through 1430, 1472(c), 1502 and 1522;49 U.S.C. 106(g) (Revised Pub. L. 97-449, January 12, 1983).</ITAG>49. Section 171.49 would be amended by revising paragraph (e) and the concludingtext to the section to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 171.49 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Installation requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(e) The facility must have, or be supplemented by (depending on the circumstances)the following ground-air or landline communications services:(1) At facilities outside of and not immediately adjacent to controlledairspace, ground-air communications from the airport served by the facilitymust be available. The utilizaton of voice on the ILS frequency shouldbe determined by the facility operator on an individual basis.(2) At facilities within or immediately adjacent to controlled airspace,there must be the ground-air communications required by paragraph (e)(1)of this section and reliable communications (at least a landline telephone)from the airport to the nearest FAA air traffic control or communicationsfacility.Paragraphs (e)(1) and (e)(2) of this section are not mandatory at airportswhere an adjacent FAA facility can communicate with aircraft on the groundat the airport and during the entire proposed instrument approach procedure.In addition, at low traffic density airports within or immediately adjacentto controlled airspace, and where extensive delays are not a factor, therequirements of paragraphs (e)(1) and (e)(2) of this section may be reducedto reliable communications (at least a landline telephone) from the airportto the nearest FAA air traffic control or communications facility, if anadjacent FAA facility can communicate with aircraft during the proposedinstrument approach procedure down to the airport surface or at least tothe minimum approach altitude.50. Section 171.113 would be amended by revising (f) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 171.113 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Installation requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(f) The facility must have the following ground-air or landline communicationsservices:(1) At facilities outside of and not immediately adjacent to controlledairspace, there must be ground-air communications from the airport servedby the facility. The utilization of voice on the SDF should be determinedby the facility operator on an individual basis.(2) At facilities within or immediately adjacent to controlled airspace,there must be ground-air communications required by paragraph (b)(1) ofthis section and reliable communications (at least a landline telephone)from the airport to the nearest FAA air traffic control or communicationsfacility.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 171.271 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>51. In andSection; 171.271, paragraph (e) would be amended by changing thewords ``air traffic control areas'' and ``air traffic control zones orareas'' to read ``controlled airspace.''<ITAG tagnum="21">Issued in Washington, DC, on September 18, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">David J. Hurley,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Acting Director, Air Traffic Operations Service.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-23692 Filed 10-17-89; 8:45 a.m.]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-13-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>